My main man had a birthday this past weekend, a holiday weekend here in Canada. For a very fitting cake, i made him one made of popcorn, chocolate candies (M & Ms, not truly vegan i know...), pretzels, and marshmallow. I veganized this recipe. It really is a cake with J's name all over it - he loves all these treats as snacks separated so i knew it was a winner. Of course, we completed it with vanilla ice creem and whipped creem (i won't name the brand here because they still have not perfected their product but oh well, they're trying).
Above the antique mantel was displayed
Of course, you need somewhere to write a greeting, and this set of matching tags is perfect. Write on the ones you want to use and tuck them into the card; use any left over to attach to your gift. The banckgrounds are created in the same way as the main panels with distress inks, perfect pearls, and overstamping the sentiments using black archival and clear embossing powder. Some bailer twine makes a great, masculine alternative to ribbon. Sorry Lee, not a flower in sight on this card :-)
They found their wives unable to obtain hospital beds in childbirth, their children unable to obtain school places, their homes and neighbourhoods changed beyond recognition, their plans and prospects for the future defeated; at work they found that employers hesitated to apply to the immigrant worker the standards of discipline and competence required of the native-born worker; they began to hear, as time went by, more and more voices which told them that they were now the unwanted.
Making more headroom with the large plates. Yesterday, we both got down in the basement and worked out the steps in order to shoot a live person. Kristin’s been immensely helpful; I’m a bit overwhelmed by the difficulty and the scale of things, but she gently pushes me forward. We photographed her face yesterday; I knew that she’d be patient while I figured out the steps. We were trying to possibly even make a nice picture, rather than a straight dry test, so we added smoky makeup to her eyes. Red lips, in collodion, general turn black, but we didn’t know what eye makeup would do. It shot amazingly invisible; had to keep piling it on.
Yellow tells of heaven,
Since I couldn't be company photographer, I opted to do my part by keeping the secret and getting her front porch spiffy for the homecoming. The second part was my idea. Anyone think he noticed?
How To Construct Your Dream Home
* 1 teaspoon vanilla extract
This pattern was verified by a much more rigorous analysis in the peer-reviewed journal PLosOne last year. The authors broke the laws down somewhat differently, into four levels (no provision, abstinence covered, abstinence promoted, abstinence stressed), and plotted them against state teen pregnancy rates, like this:
Remember, you can earn up to 500 max points per day simply by...
Sill refusing to look at the camera! Oh, and she refused to let go of that map for hours!
life's the same merry-go-round
Definitely need some research on the physics under all that. Maybe this change impacts some other species. Maybe it makes people weaker, or stupider, or slower, or tired more easily. Or maybe the opposite. Probably not the opposite.
Samantha Rose Scott was born on February 28, 2011 with Trisomy 18. The same disease that the doctors told us my sweet Little A might have when he was in my tummy.
People then started putting carved, candle-laden veggies in their Windows at night to keep Jack away. The tradition migrated to America, where pumpkins became the object of choice, apparently because they’re bigger, easier to carve and have more surface area for spooky faces to scare Jack away.
Dinner Saturday night was at a restaurant on the Main Line, in Bryn Mawr . We ate at Verdad, and met Reena’s husband there as well. The food was fabulous and marks the first time I’ve ever been to a tapas restaurant.
I can not share everything just yet, but will eventually.
that IT DOES NOT MATTER!!!!
Those who can appreciate what is real and unreal cannot give up the pleasure of hearing about Krsna’s name and fame. So just imagine the pain Arjuna felt in having to give up Krsna’s personal intimate company.
A good aviation consultant will give you those options, make suggestions, and handle all of the details for you. Bon voyage!
Would he have fallen not knowing the answer to these questions? He did not know.
This fall card was featured on the cover of the November 2011 CARDS Magazine. It is my all-time favorite from this year. It represents so much for me, but mostly a dream realized... and the beginning of something that I hope continues to grow and blossom.
(Jeremiah 29:11-13 (NIV))
The winners will be voted by all participating EvaDress customers, fellow entrants and members (followers) of this blog.
(Please do not tell him I wrote this list. Our marriage works on a very carefully managed balance in which we keep each other's heads from blowing up from our own mutual coolness factors. *nods*)
the Spirit get the mastery of the body. We know nothing can hurt the true
with Truth,
I don’t know if there’s any poison left in me. I don’t know if there is any way for me to find out, but maybe this will help me draw out any remainders.
and we will have a silvery sleep-in.
Spirit of gloomiest fears and doubts, (yet onward ever unfaltering
This post is really just about celebrating how Great God is ...and how with the smallest of offerings, He uses it, magnifies it and changes lives. I just want to thank all those who prayed with me, all those who gave with me, and all those who now rejoice in all the good things God has done, and will continue to do for the children in Haiti.
It’s simple, it’s shocking but most of all it’s fun. The humour inherent in the posters takes nothing away from the seriousness of the subject matter. In fact, I’d argue, by turning AIDS advertising on its head – ie: by no longer hammering people with the doom, gloom, grim-reaper messaging – and instead playing up the fun side of sex (because yes, from experience I can faithfully and happily report it can be fun) the message conveyed is all the more effective.
Sometimes the greatest danger comes from the concealed source, from the disguised, at least overt behaviours give warning, whilst disguise aids only the attacker, perhaps when finally the mask is pulled from evils face it will be too late, we a people fattened up for slaughter. Can you see it, do you not know, can you not look around you and see, look, we trek towards the unholy, the malevolent, the godless, each new law, each new disallowance a brick in a gulag wall, a strengthening of evils armour in its war against the people. Today they lead us, lead us to their promised land, to theirs whilst we leave our own behind, lost in the fog of history, so much gone, so much, our very culture vilified and scrutinised for this new order, gone this and gone that, it is not politically correct, our way or no way and still as drones you work on, toil on, pay their board and service them as whores, as indeed do I.
Wrapped his legs around his swag and stuck his left hand through the strap
Do I continue on with my days as normal?
Then time to grind some graham crackers in the food processor and add all the ingredients for the delicious crust. I did find the crust slightly over salted and might add a tad less salt next time. Everyone else thought it was perfect.
All the way so they know
I saw two children drinking milk in a window opposite a car buried in a snowbank, a little boy and girl.
11:15-1:15 Panel 5: David Hanan, Riri Riza, Lisabona Rahman, Pak Berthy
When Sauber copied the F-duct at the 2010 Australian GP, they had their F-duct stall the wing via a stalling slot in the main plane of the rear wing. While Ferrari and Red Bull followed McLaren with a flap stalling F-duct, Force India, Renault and latterly Toro Rosso have gone the way of a main plane stalling solution. By stalling the wing much further upstream, its possible that the disruption to the airflow further reduces the upwash, in turn reducing drag even further. On the downside the wing may take longer to see the flow fully reattach when the duct is disengaged.
Here are some activities in the books (before Blytonisation): swearing; wanting to have sex with someone; having sex with someone; drinking blood; drinking vodka; psycho killers cutting prostitutes to ribbons; inhumane experiments on people purchased as slaves; trying to drown someone; beheading someone. Which of these are normal activities that most people will engage in at some time in their lives? Swearing, drinking vodka, wanting to have sex, having sex. Which are activities to be discouraged, amongst both teens and adults, and which most people will never engage in? Drinking blood, trying to drown someone, beheading someone, cutting prostitutes to ribbons, conducting inhumane experiments on trafficked slaves. So which shall we remove from the books?
Stafford has more than answered the bell this season and proven that the Lions made the right choice in finding their franchise quarterback.
This week the challenge team is challenging you to think outside of the box....Create any card or project that is not an A2, A6, or A7 rectangular or square card. It can be a different fold (diamond fold, joy fold, easel, accordion, step, sidestep etc.) or a different shape.
But there are other cues that voters can and do utilize that reflect their ideology without having to go through the tedium of researching the issues directly. They include columnists, analysts, peers and friends. I have had many a political discussions recently with a number of friends who know that I make it my business to stay on top of the issues and that I can see through the deluge of propaganda. I have no idea if I have influenced their vote and I never advocate for a particular decision, but I can answer questions with a balanced perspective. If I am asked, I will indicate how I intend to vote, but that question rarely comes up – those friends are seeking information, not advice. And I am interested in their views as well because I do not come up with my perspective out of thin air – I cannot see a given issue from all possible perspectives.
The story builds slowly to faster and ever more gripping events, as Ruby and Simon struggle to decide who they should believe...and what, if anything, two twelve year old kids can do. The distance between them lessens as they realize that, when working in harmony, magic and science can work wonders.
along with several thousand dreams.
brother against brother and father against son.
“More than 500 volcanic vents have been identified in the State of California. At least 76 of these vents have erupted, some repeatedly, during the last 10,000 years. … Sooner or later, volcanoes in California will erupt again, and they could have serious impacts on the health and safety of the State’s citizens as well as on its economy.” Miller, C. Dan, 1989, Potential Hazards from Future Volcanic Eruptions in California: U.S. Geological Survey Bulletin 1847, 17p.
How are your dreams coming? Share them in the comment section and let’s cheer each other on!
JS - Answer me this one. You met last week with a guy called Bill Kidley who set up a supporters’ survey which showed that 96 to 97% of all Scottish fans outside of Rangers fans and even some of them wanted any newco, and we are slightly ahead of ourselves here, as we don’t yet know what’s going to happen, any newco not to be allowed into the SPL and the argument was that fans are saying, if a new company can simply parachute back in to the SPL, sporting integrity dies.
And one of the crib!
Nonetheless…the food was tastely and you could even taste the $150.00 a plate ingredients! LOL……
Supertramp School’s out UK
My first words should have been… ‘Dianne (sister) is choking me with the dog’s collar.’
The clearing was suddenly quiet; Stolik realized that he was pulling the trigger on an empty pistol. Click…click…click.
Because of the diversity of denominations that we represent, we do not observe communion. However, during camp and when appropriate, we mimic the Salvation Army’s “Bread and Cup Service.” Because our members are visual and tactical learners, we often use practical applications to teach the weekly lesson. In preparing this lesson, I could think of no better illustration than to have a time where our members obeyed Jesus when He said, “Do this to remember me.”
"How is our patent?" he says with an overenthusiastic laugh, and tapping my baby bump, "We'll soon have you out of there!"
Then there was a section on sex(ual imagery) in different cultures.
Wes gives us a slight, closed mouth grin, tucking his hands into his front pockets. His forearm peeks out from his cuff, and I see what looks like writing on the underside. He must notice too because he instinctively pulls his sleeve back to his wrist. All eyes in the class follow as Mr. Pierce leads Wes to the empty table in the back. My tablet chimes with an incoming message, from Summer of course. It says one word—tattoo.
A Bit About Marketing
I'm convinced that my water broke that first time, and that it broke a second time two days later (the bag can reseal, temporarily or permanently, after breaking).
Wow – I have not posted in over a year, but there is truly something on my heart. Forgive me if this goes long. I am reading from a book, “King’s Cross” by Timothy Keller that Johnnie Moore, our Campus Pastor recommended to me and am going to share an excerpt from the chapter called “The Healing”
“Nope, it’s smokin’. Seriously. And you know me. I would say. And your ass looks great in those pants. Badunka, dunk!”
As open pussie's mortal foes,
The Way, Truth, And Life
Slowing down Robert Johnson's 'King of the Delta Blues Singers' was
Because God is sovereign, I will joyfully submit to His Will, Amen!
-Shihoco
we did lots of fun things when they were here visiting, namely the fashion island mall’s enormous christmas tree display.
Felt only slightly better than yesterday. Feels like my legs forgot how to operate. Shin was ok, though. Hiking.
Then you have the WTF / Shock / Sad together… when you wake yourself up in shock reaching for your spouse and you realize that they are gone and you say WTF and then you realize what is going on and that makes you sad. Which then causes insomnia and adds to the Yucky. It's an endless cycle.
The next few years after that, I didn’t write much at all. I was so busy with adjusting to life with a new baby and very little sleep that I didn’t miss it. Then one day, all of that changed, and I woke up and thought something is missing. I hadn’t had my outlet of writing in ages. So, I decided to make a change.
Investigators noted that on 31st May 2008 that account contained USD 29.6 million!
It's all pretty good!
I've been in love with Vera's new perfume Lovestruck. (I avoided writing Vera Wang because I like to think she and I are secretly friends and on a first name basis!)
In his later years Mr. Guerra took up writing and publishing poetry again, as well as working in fiction. He would also paint and sculpt.
Hi Everyone! Happy Wednesday to you!
Finding an opportunity to speak Iqra began again, “Shahzeb wants me to go back to him. He thinks he made a big-time mistake with that girl. He shouldn’t have let me go and stuffs. He wanted to ‘correct his mistake’, Yeah! that’s exactly what he said.”
A little bit more disambiguation: my intentions here are perhaps deceptively arcane. I am focused on the metaphysics of the mind-body relationship. When I argue that, metaphysically speaking, there are in fact no such things as “mind” or “meaning,” I am arguing that traditional notions of those concepts are currently misleading us in our efforts to understand how the nervous system works. I don’t think any radical change in the way we talk is called for. In fact it is my view that a great deal of our psychological talk is ineliminable, and I think this goes for “mind,” “reference” and “meaning” just as much as for “belief” and “desire” and “beauty” and “justice,” and for the same reasons. If one accepts the present argument against mental representation, it still makes as much sense as it ever did to ask “What are you thinking about?” or “What is that book about?” or “What does that word mean?” The metaphysical question is about the proper semantic analysis of the way that we have always talked; that is nothing like a critique. As Wittgenstein said, “Philosophy changes nothing.” If the present proposal that intentional predicates pick out relationships between embodied persons and their environments is sound then that has always been what we have been doing. Jettisoning realism about mental representations is a substantial matter for cognitive science – I would stress the importance for developing experimental paradigms in brain science – but it’s hard to see how it could have any effect on popular usage of intentional terms.
4.Tomorrow is the neighborhood talent show and the prize is having your favorite reliable and awesome babysitter for FREE every Thursday night for the next two years. What are you going to do to WOW those judges and win the prize?
Note: If you're having problems linking (especially to SCS), try entering the link to your card, then choosing From File instead of From Web. Then just browse to where your picture is saved on your computer to get your thumbnail.
05 Runaway Train
sprayed the paper with ink. I decided I was not going to get to crazy over making my grid
That’s the words I heard at about 9 a.m. from a woman I was attempting to persuade to join a different phone service. I simply giggled and moved to click onto another incoming call, when I heard my co-worker say, “Some old geezer just told me a plane flew into New York’s Twin Towers.” Another co-worker said, “Hmm, that’s weird. This lady just said terrorists are attacking the US right this minute and that I need to go home and hug my babies.”
Increased risk aversion will have significant impacts on the kinds of lives the negligibly senescent will live. An increased reluctance to drive is only the start. Driving, after all, is a relatively safe activity. What about foreign travel to the more distressed regions of the globe or high-impact sports? Both could be ruled out, along with many more enjoyable activities such as real (as opposed to virtual) sexual intercourse. And this is where we hit upon the crucial point: becoming more risk averse might result in us losing much of what we value. Here we get a whisper of Agar’s species-relativist argument -- a whisper that will wait until chapter 9 to be properly heard.
We do it by controlling the purse strings, and we do that by making the government refer to us for permission to raise and spend funds. Our tool is the referendum, our philosophy is thus "referism" and we are "referists" or, in colloquial terms, "reffers". If we want a political party, and I would not advise it, then we set up a Referist Party.
They twitched and moved, and I turned around. Looking right at my wings, they were full of feathers, in the mirror, they were all bony and fleshy and gross. I could see at my shoulder blades where the base of my wings sort of melted into my back, fused with skin that started creeping spidery up my wings.
Waters of God do see
Sugar, 1 tablespoon
Their first release since 2008′s moderately well-received Float and live album Live at the Greek Theater, Speed of Darkness marks a turning point for celtic punk rock band Flogging Molly; the album is being released on Borstal Beats Records, their self-owned record label. With the utmost creative control available to them SoD sets itself up as nothing but a vehicle of promise on which it partially delivers, alongside the comforting feeling of having heard it all before.
With a few exceptions. I just had a person post a 1 star review on B&N. Had nothing to do with the book. She was pissed that her copy didn’t arrive on time. It isn’t like I hand deliver the books, so why not slap customer service and not me? I had a person post the identity of the villain in my book once. It took a few emails but I did get Amazon to pull the review. I didn’t care that she hated the book. I did care that she gave away a substantial piece of the plot. I even asked Amazon to pull the single line and not her whole review. After all, the person has a right to share an opinion. I’ve gotten great reviews, on sales sites and review sites. Nice ego strokes but alas, nothing more.
Kari, check out my etsy site because Lindsay has uploaded a bunch of new pin cushion rings and bracelets. Let me know which one you'd like. I will also need you to email me your address to val dot campbell dot 4320 @ gmail.com.
My sister gave me a copy of Steve Jobs’ biography for my birthday (yep, one happened recently, shame on you if you forgot…). I wondered if she was trying to tell me something… perhaps along the lines of “become a multi-millionaire entrepreneur so you can buy me a house“. Or something. No matter what you might think of mister Jobs you have to admire what he achieved. I don’t think I’m much of an entrepreneur, if I was I’d probably at least have a yacht by now ;-) I frequently wonder if being successful in business is compatible with a love of riding bikes and paddling kayaks. I tell myself that I’m not a wildly successful entrepreneur because my priorities are riding bikes and paddling kayaks rather than making money.. But perhaps that’s bollocks, after all one only has to look at Mike Sinyard, founder of Specialized Bicycle Company, to realise that riding bikes and being successful in business are not necessarily mutually exclusive. No, rather I think sometimes my problem is simply one of discipline and prioritisation.. and of course ”not being a natural entrepreneur” is always a handy excuse to have in one’s back pocket. Case in point yesterday, Monday, dawned beautifully sunny.. a cheeky Monday morning session in the surf turned into a cheeky late lunch of a Cornish pasty sitting in the sun with a friend on the harbour wall in Hayle which turned into “oh gosh is that the time..! Hardly worth starting anything now“. Then again I worked on the weekend.. well, some of it, and I’ve swapped the steady security of an employed career for the hard work, uncertainty and much reduced income of setting out alone so one may as well take advantage of the non-material benefits that brings. Of course I have confidence in myself in that I’ve always been disciplined and prioritised correctly when it really mattered, I wouldn’t have the freedom I have now I suspect if I hadn’t. There it is, confidence in myself.. that’s what this is about I think, confidence in my ability to be successful at whatever I do. Why am I writing all this.. errm, well it’s just something I was thinking about on my bike this morning, while riding home from a small business workshop I’ll have you know.. So not a ride for pleasure but rather for business -although I did very much enjoy the 60km round trip through the early springtime Cornish countryside.
The lever
And finally CERTAINTY – They are absolutely certain people will sit up and take notice of them now.
Kwe
A lot of new books have appeared or been translated in these ten years. I did read most of what was available (in English) in 2001, when I made my first set of versions. Since then I've ranged a bit further afield - into the latest German editions, as well as the sumptuous 2-volume French edition of his correspondence with Gisèle.
Santa Cruz police spokesman Zach Friend called the slaying a “senseless” attack.
As Michelle Grattan at Fairfax puts it; “Gillard’s spectacular U-turn on everything she’d said before on Craig Thomson and Peter Slipper has left her looking nakedly expedient, and further exposed the state of crisis within the government.”
Goats are great swimmers.
Is there a ‘hard target’ IQ number at which people who fall under it are simply just too dumb to realize that this has been precision timed to run right up into the gut of the presidential election???
Still loneliness creeps in
Your difficulties will not defeat you remember you have an exceptional lawyer fighting for you his name is GOD and he will fight your battles for you and bring to fulfillment all the desires in your heart. Have a little faith today my friends. God bless you with love peace and most importantly FAITH to get you through your day.
Healthy life expectancy (m/f) 71/74
I put the vest on, and ummfffff. I have to say it felt kind of like a giant had his thumb on my head and was trying to squish me. I took a (not-too-long the first time out) walk, and had a number of thoughts. One, it felt more like aerobic exercise than resistance, because I noticed that my breathing became just a teeny bit labored, as if I was climbing stairs. However, it could help with leg muscles, since though the weights aren’t on my legs, they are still making my legs work harder carrying more overall weight. I did feel some discomfort in my neck and shoulders from the pressure while wearing it and was worried I might have a backache afterwards, but I didn’t. I might have had it too snugly Velcro-ed, but I had a slight sensation of my lungs being cramped for lack of room. I’m making it sound worse than it was, but I definitely didn’t have the free and easy feeling I usually experience when walking, which was kind of a bummer. One of the things I love about weighing less is that lighter feeling when walking – so delicious.
The deadline for Week 6 blog assignments is Sunday, May 13th, by midnight.
Stock up on both handcrafted and manufactured goods at the grand opening of the Sacramento Craft and Flea Outdoor Marketplace. The event is presented by the Sacramento Antique Faire that's held every second Sunday of the month. The craft and flea market will be held every fourth Sunday of the month.
A large percentage of homes currently for sale are in need of renovation; everything from cosmetic updates to major structural repairs.
Wei took the handset from the man. “Wei here.”
Sometimes a new belt, change of length, additional stitching or different combination of accessories can transform an outfit. Trust me, it’s very satisfying when people ask where an outfit is from and the answer is ‘part charity shop, part old garment, part hand-me-down’.
These soft, light, rolled out delicious cookies are fun to make not only because cookie cutters and colored sugars are used, but the two step or overnight process means the dough is prepared one day and refrigerated. On the second day the rolling pin, pastry sheet and cookie cutters are used. So fun to bake with your children or grandchildren! There are also other times during the year when my cookie cutters and my red/white rolling pin are located and used. However, before Christmas they are always used!
Headband- Michi Mouse Headband-Pink- ::Michi Yuu:: (Kawaii Fair)
We ask and ask, for ears that hear us,
My back still gets little twinges but nothing major. I have recently started doing Pilates. For strengthening of my core which will keep my back in alignment, so hopefully no surgery in my future.
My son stole this from me from the second he smelled it. He has a serious lip balm hoarding problem, lol. If I'm missing a lip balm I know he has it somewhere. He really liked the scent/flavor I have, and it perfectly moisturizes and hydrates his lips. Like my son, I too have really dry lips and I found this lip balm to be very hydrating.
I went through a mixed emotion and feeling through a journey of nearly 2000kms touching the southern tip of the country as well as the beginning of the Western Ghats. For a week there were quite no television, laptop, internet and newspaper to let know anything happening around and it was a world boundless to any thought or thinking about home or things to depress than impressed by many way.
So these 3 images are of an explosion box which I made up for my Godmother who will be 50 next sunday and I won't be home till late that nite so I made them up before hand incase my Mam wants to give them to her so this one is from my mam,sister and nana I have never made one before and found it quite fun and I think it turned out well as u can see I used the digi from karens doodles again thought it went well with the theme lol
Chinese and Philippine diplomats failed to end the dangerous impasse after resuming talks on Monday.
That is The Plan. We will see about the execution of The Plan....
Both websites provide a list of foods that leave alkaline residues, a special diet to follow and some extras, such as alkaline water and some nutritional supplements to help you with your pH diet. They also suggest you measure your urine's and saliva's pH level to control your blood's acid-base balance. You can check the links if you want to see for yourself.
Oh god, I've just put that idea in their head now haven't I?
25) DR. CALIGARI’S GRUSELKABINETT – The Vampires of Dartmoore
Producer Marin Karmitz talks about the making of Red and tells a story about an elaborate shot that was achieved and the difficult logistics involved. He also recounts a story of how the film received three Academy Award nominations as an American film!
You wait four years for an acetate to show up on "Left and to the Back", then two come along at once. Either I've suddenly become a very wealthy man, or I've managed to find a cheap source for a couple (guess which. It shouldn't be hard).
Open doors would soon be shut
1 oz fresh yeast, or 1 tsp dried
I think it’s a pretty important topic, and though patterns of migration have changed over the last 50 years, in trying to discover the significance of present patterns and how to deal with them, it can also be instructive to look at attempts to deal with migration in the past. One of the major patterns of migration in South Africa in the past was, of course, the ethnic cleansing that took place between 1950 and 1990 to implement the apartheid policy, in which about 3-5 million people were forced to leave their homes.
then all of a sudden looked at their phone.......
--There was a feeling as if I had less responsibility for my partner, especially regarding her axis, and this provided a sensation of great freedom and autonomy.
Doesn't that sound nice, 5 Cents. I think it does. There isn't many things one can buy for only 5 cents. How about for a bottle of alcohol? To the many wine lovers around the world, getting a bottle for just 5 pennies is in fact, a real deal. At BevMo, when you buy one bottle of wine, you get the second one for just 5 cents. If I enjoyed wine, I would take full advantage of this deal. But I don't. I like beer.
Over the last few years, I have dug deeper into providing peer support and trainings in media, storytelling and legislative advocacy for people in the sex industry via my work at the Red Umbrella Project. Through this work, I have been critically examining the ways that the sex worker rights community talks about what we do and what we want to see change. I have been looking hard and close at who this “we” of the sex worker rights community is, and I have been listening hard to people who feel excluded by that “we.”
This month our sweet old girl turned 19. I've been pretty amazed, but maybe I shouldn't be. She is quite possible THE most sheltered kitty in the world. She's 100% indoors, she eats well, and is just never, ever exposed to any dangers...unless you consider the dogs, that she slaps around or head butts depending on her mood, a danger.
Taken from radio recordings, shellac and vinyl records, and television shows, this collection spans Bing’s entire career. If you are a Bing Crosby fan, or if you just want some lovely Christmas music to get you into the holiday mood, you will find this collection is something that you will want to play and keep for many years to come.
Because the obvious next step is that "Reason" and "Rationality" be forcibly applied to sci-fi, comics and the rest of it. If you poke around comments sections and message boards you'll see this process is already taking root.
But not everybody has the choices she had, nor the health to exercise the choices. Most old people do not own their own businesses, and most employers decidedly favor the younger employees.
Oh sure, practices went fairly well, but now it's a game. Now it's for REAL.
Free State Brewing Co. Copperhead Pale Ale
Email marketing can junk up the time works and make you as efficient as a sloth under the mid-day sun. You can perk up your work habits with a few tips from the email marketing pros:
Our property is about 1/2 wooded. There is a good section of woods directly behind the house - maybe 50 feet from the back door.
Ty thought hard as his eyes went back and forth from his beer to the napkin, napkin to beer. “Nothing,” he replied.
- Seek and discover more community interaction sites like messageboards, etc. This includes posting our articles on messageboards or fan clubs of subjects we have mentioned.
May Allah make KhatPat Corner a success. May it be a means of getting people talking and working together to eradicate the evils that fester and threaten to transform our communities into seething cesspits of vice.
"Again the hospitable board
Wow. It has been a pretty eventful last two weeks for us here. I know you've already heard about most of this. Just in case you didn't, here we go. First the nasty stomach bug that lasted forever, then a fever thing for Eisley that overlapped with the pukey grossness, and now the two older kids have RSV. The coughing started Sunday night and fever on Monday. After four days of 103 temps I decided we'd better get into the doctor. Fun times to be had by all, I can assure you. Rowan's surgery is postponed until March. His birthday month. Ah well, it will all work out. Eisley did start coughing a couple nights ago, but no fever yet. Saying lots of prayers here, for real. Also during this time Eisley has cut a tooth (her fever was in the 102's so I don't think it had to do with her teeth) and there must be more coming because she will not sleep and clingy is an understatement. We are still doing potty learning with Rowan (going on a year here folks, which he initiated!) and I do believe that I've had poop on my hands no less than five times in the last 24 hours. Despite the accidents, he has successfully worn unds out and used "strange" potties with no problem. In fact, he seems way more eager to use other bathrooms than our own. Also, we've gotten poop IN the potty at least three times! Pee in the potty hasn't been the struggle, it's the poop. We'll get there. John worked all weekend and then Wednesday and Thursday. Poor guy is supposed to work 9am to 9pm, but most of those days he came home late. A couple nights he got home right before midnight. Just comes with the territory of his job, but I think we are all pretty worn out. Thanks so much for all the encouraging words, prayers, healing thoughts and words. I cannot tell you all how supported I've felt through this bumpy time. Thank God for the Internet. I think I would be insane by now without it.
I hope you are all having a wonderful weekend full of family, friends and maybe an Easter egg roll or two (&the resulting candy, of course). :-)
The fit little people in my family put in a superb effort!
You've been asking for lamb pictures and I've been trying to get them, but honestly these lambs are still in high overdrive mode and most of my photos end up being blurrrrrrrs as they race from place to place. I just happened to get this shot of one of Carley's boys sleeping soundly in a feed pan. He did this for several days! He's just a day or so old here - you can see he still had his tail at that point.
After my family left, I started off Easter Sunday at my lovely coworker/friend Marc's brunch in his Hell's Kitchen apartment, where everyone ate and drank outside on his enormous outdoor balcony. We also celebrated his sweet dog Sydney's birthday. It was so nice to see all of my L'Oreal pals and finally drink that Bloody Mary! (On a sidenote, I was sitting against a maroon couch on the balcony, the color which unbeknownst to me, reflected into my hair. Everyone thought I had purple streaks the entire time, hah! I wish I were that daring.)
Right now, all you diehard horror hounds are asking, "But is it scary?" Let's put it this way: I may have just barely escaped without shrieking like a girl (and believe me, there was more than one macho male in the audience who can't lay claim to that)...but I did spill my Cherry Pepsi all over my lap during the initial Ouija scene, and probably would have done so again if I hadn't been too embarrassed to get up for a refill.
Today I have the opportunity to introduce readers of SNAP! and the blog, to a new talent in town. Fresh from Vancouver Island University, interior designer Deanna Sellyeh has recently come to Victoria to bring her unique design approach to our neighbourhood.
iridescent geometry
That's the time you must keep on trying
remembered from March to September.
She also accuses Woolas of ‘fuelling Islamophobia’. Not that again! There is one thing Muslims like Ridley and MPACUK overlook when they talk about things fuelling Islamophobia. Yes; perhaps it is Muslims or Islam itself which fuels Islamophobia! Is that not even possible?
I learned that being cheated on is a lot more common than we think it is, but it carries a stigma of shame for us women when it happens to us. Even though it’s not (and never is) the fault of the person who is wronged, it’s feels like a clear statement of “You aren’t enough for me.” And that really sucks.
I got up and plodded down the stairs to crank up the heater. I also put on a pot of coffee. My wife and daughter were still asleep – I on the other hand had not had a good night.
This is one of my favorite shots, it was taken while I was staying out in Waconia House sitting. I love taking pictures in Winter. Winter is the time when the Earth sleeps, when she puts away all the green, when she is done harvesting in the Autumn, and She is preparing to be born anew the next year.
I am amazed at how Frost is able to keep track of all the different plot threads she has going in all her books. The set up for Eternal Kiss of Darkness began in At Grave's End - three published books ago. It's brilliant how the smallest detail can lead to a whole story later on, how author's can think so far ahead and slip in seeds for a later book. Just brilliant!
My son has more drama in his life!
(i) The suit filed before the District Court by Hilltone Pvt. Ltd of Mount Abu was a suit for groundless threats of trademark infringement. The cause of action being the legal notices sent by Hilton International to Hilltone Pvt. Ltd warning them to stop using the Hilltone mark as the same was infringing Hilton’s registered trade mark.
Quick info for tonight in a forty minute time limit much like my test today:
I was freezing on my run this morning. I had a long-sleeved training shirt on, but the wind went through that thing like pucks past Roberto Luongo. I had gloves, but I only wore my very thin ones, thinking it wouldn’t be super cold. Wrong. I ran almost five and a half hours ago and my hands are still cold. It’s clearly time to break out the serious cold weather training gear.
Kris Kelvin travels millions of miles to combat an alien consciousness…his own. Andrei Tarkovsky’s existential masterpiece is an introspective journey into a foreign world, where the cold sea can wash away sin or drown the victim in its sentient embrace.
Second, the Borg Queen is a great villain. She was a necessary addition to make the Borg Collective’s comparison to an insect hive complete. Her appearance is enhanced here because it is the only appearance with true menace. Subsequentl7, the Borg became property of VOY and were overused to the point of cliché. I never really got the sense of menace out of her later appearances, even when Alice Krige reprised the role on television.
We ignore what the bible says about slavery because the bible got slavery wrong.
We are having a little work done to our backyard and deck so I am pretty sure thats what's fueling it.
SHEPARD RANDALL
Vinyl (I used contact paper but you could also just use masking tape)
“Do you know what you are doing, you aren’t commander yet. Maybe you never will be.”
15. Your dreams have no limits, you are the creator of your dreams, big or small. When this is understood, you are able to design a way to favour you plan and accomplish your end goal.
These information exploration tools you’ll be able to view any web pages on the Internet. If you are using Cheap guild wars 2 gold an array of applications, these types of scraping resources are extremely useful for a person. You also are interested in downloading info through web sites, information and paperwork you have to duplicate the actual head.
A pub in the Yorkshire Dales is currently being used as a library after the villagers of Hudswell bought it to save it from closing.
3. You become more sincere, and that dedication towards what you do becomes contagious.
It soon came to the point where I was in fact running LEAP during my “free time”, which wasn’t really free time. Which meant I was making flyers, brochures, printing things, sending emails at work and in class. Surprisingly I was not giving up my sleep just yet. Despite all of this I still somehow managed to get in some writing last semester, so how did I do it? Some of you may be familiar with my tag “cellphone poems”, well this is the story of them.
Oh, and I made Killer pancakes this morning....
A fun fact. I found out mine and Olivias connection (more than going to school in the same city) It sounds really stretched, but it’s actually not as far as it sounds. Cousins girlfriends sister-in-laws friend. That’s Olivia! Haha. Small world isn’t it?
2) All Purpose Seasoned Flour (normally used to fry chicken) (Already contain salt)
Summer term… 12 weeks of targets crammed into 6 intense weeks. Mad, simply mad; Digital Design & 20th Century History.
US Central Command (CENTCOM) believes it can destroy or significantly degrade Iran’s conventional armed forces in about three weeks using air and sea strikes, a defense source told The Washington Post.
Valtari
As an example of a concerted, systematic and persistent research exploration of a particular set of ideas the book is indeed outstanding. Where it falls short is in an apparent deficiency of historical and theoretical background. Altemeyer writes as if no-one before him has had much useful to say on the topics of ideology or authoritarianism and he accordingly very largely ignores what can only be described as two vast literatures. In his earlier book (Altemeyer, 1981) he did review the literature on authoritarianism up to about 1972 or 1973 fairly comprehensively but the later book made no attempt to update that review. So most of what has been written on his topic since 1973 is effectively ignored by him.
Over the past couple o f years, I have been interested to meet Christians, even academics, who have spoken disparagingly oflain Murray’s two-volumed biography ofMartyn Lloyd- Jones.27 To me, their response is a superficial and prejudiced one. Allow me to reply to their criticism. Murray’s biography is an official one, based largely on primary sources, and written by a man who knew Lloyd-Jones extremely well. He had served under and alongside the Doctor and then remained in close contact with him over the years. A competent historian and possessing an excellent grasp of the contemporary evangelical situation in the United Kingdom, Murray is eminently suited to write the biography of Lloyd-Jones. The second volume especially is “a primary text on evangelicalism in the twentieth century”.28 And this
"You show him where the cow is when he gets here, OK?"
Then the question is, how is Nestlé benefiting its investors by linking its name to this initiative?
Wilde, Oscar. De Profundis, The Ballad of Reading Gaol, & Other Writings. Hertfordshire: Wordsworth Classics, 1999.
6:45AM - Set racks in oven. One on the top tier for roasting potatoes and parsnips. The second far enough down to allow the turkey to fit in the oven.
No...not a fight about the volume of the CD player.
Directions are as follows:
I love to tuck our guest into the Gable Room! It's high high ceiling, big window and antique furnishings makes this room feel so snug and comfortable...
We drove for miles and miles, we drank watery hot chocolate from an airport cafe but that's okay because we also saw the sunset, along with planes take off that had the most golden colour to them. We didn't board a plane, we didn't even welcome anyone home but we did dream of the places we would go, and where we may find ourselves one day. We drove from one end of the city to the other. We sat in silence, we sat laughing, we were content. We did it for no reason at all, other than it made us happy and isn't that enough? It sure is.
Math Centers:
If you still have one of these....get it out and dust it off. I use it at least once a week on my cooking plan!
Paper: Crumb Cake, Whisper White,
Our plane ended up being about an hour late for takeoff...during which I had the breakfast of champions = latte , chocolate croissant, with a chardonnay chaser! The breakfast of all nervous fliers! LOL! I managed to get on the plane without too much stress, but did shed a tear when we took off....I had never been more ready to get home to my family. Flight was ok, we watched Breaking Dawn which was a good 2 hour distraction. Then I took a little nap (yay me!), then read for awhile, then started freaking out as we hit some bumpiness getting closer to Houston! The descent felt like a roller coaster, and the group of high school kids on our flight proceeded to throw their hands in the air everytime we hit a bump and say "Wooooaaaahhh!" LOL! Then after a less than ideal landing, they broke out into applause.
"Economically Challenged" Kansas City Royals & Pittsburgh Pirates
It’s been two weeks, which means it’s time for friends and podcasters John S. Drew and Paul K. Bisson to release the latest episode of Cyborgs: A Bionic Podcast. The show is devoted to revisiting the cult-classic TV series The Six Million Dollar Man and The Bionic Woman in a roundtable discussion sorta fashion. Each show includes a guest host to share in the fun, and for this installment I was called up for third second stint in the extra chair.
is an efficient way to create
If you can keep a secret, so can I.
Where were the couple in the Witnessing, anyway? The background was an indistinct swirl of silver-grey, and though the couple were seated, she couldn't see what on. It didn't have the precision and clarity of an ordinary Witnessing at all. Pevan glanced up at Van Raighan's face, noted the sparkle of laughter deep in his eyes, and bit back a surge of anger, instead turning her attention back to the bubble.
Don't worry if you can't get down to Brighton though, there's a great selection of his work available from their online store.
So, I went over to the same stall and ordered a medium size Singapore Hokkien Mee. I paid SGD6.00 for this delicious plate of medium size Hokkien Mee. I was amazed when my daughter finished the whole plate......! This is also the first time she tasted this dish and she likes it very much!
(*Village Green Preservation Society is truly my number one, but since it made your list, I left it off.)
You're a bunch of whiny pikers.
or wonton longings
But for the enthusiasts who would rather observe this fox in the wild, there are still fennec foxes who make their homes in the Saharan desert and other dry, sandy areas of North Africa. This might be anywhere from Morocco to Egypt.
New Crane Germ Defense Humidifer -Cool or Warm Mist. New Digital display.
There are different forms of poverty, and those forms can be assessed by divergent standards. Enduring material poverty below the survival level can be good from a Darwinian perspective, insofar as it eliminates resource hogs who would drag down others; yet from a more intelligent perspective, the threat of poverty below the survival level among humans is bad because it inspires adaptations that imperil the larger society. Criminalized behavior is an example, but so is the “success story” whose early exposure to poverty made him/her ruthless in the quest for wealth. Such a person is apt to be a blight upon society, over the course of his/her life. His/her very existence draws attention away from the fact that more balanced, kindhearted people cannot and/or will not behave as s/he has done — that, indeed, his/her success tends to be built upon harm to people better than him/herself. As the adage advises, behind every great success, there is a great crime.
I'm aging, you see. I recently turned 40. I bought a house. My wife is pregnant with kid number dos. I have an old car that doesn't run and I'm not sure I'll ever find the time and money to make it run.
The group will be the voice of licensees only. Not a mix of brewers, pubco directors and publicans, and not a group of licensees just targeting one issue affecting the trade (eg smoking ban or the tie).
- Butter two 8 ½-by-4 ½-by-2 ½-inch loaf pans; set aside. Transfer dough to a lightly floured work surface. Divide dough in half. Roll out each half into a 7-by-15-inch rectangle. Sprinkle chocolate over rectangles. Starting from a short side, tightly roll each into a log; pinch seam to seal. Place each log, seam down, in a buttered pan. Cover with a clean kitchen towel; let rise at room temperature until dough reaches rim of pans and no longer feels cool, about 3 hours.
Tonight was one of those nights, and I must say the urge to write about it at once overtook me as I absolutely didn’t drive any sort of motor vehicle home. Again, because that is irresponsible and I am an adult. Anyway, here are a few of my thoughts as I ignored everyone around me and powerdrank in the corner with a sullen expression and in no way didn’t not dance my nipples off. Because dancing is for idiots and lushes.
But perhaps taking 3 is pushing our luck.
I first discovered the world of Elenchera back in 1999 and more than ten years later it remains with me. I’ve dug deep into the history and explored the twenty-three lands in detail, recording everything I’ve seen, heard and felt in a timeline stretching beyond 47,000 years and in even greater detail with two novels – Fezariu’s Epiphany (2011) and A World Apart (due May 2012). Elenchera is not for the faint hearted. Amidst the many lives of its races are stories of fierce struggles for survival, happiness plucked from the depths of misery, betrayals, love, war, discovery and wonder.
Just then the shuttle jumped from her hand and out the door. However, it began to weave a carpet before the threshold, a more beautiful one than anyone had ever seen before. At its sides blossomed roses and lilies. In its middle, against a golden background, there were rows of green upon which hares and rabbits were jumping about. In between, stags and deer stuck out their heads. Colorful birds sat above in the branches. The only thing missing was their singing. The shuttle jumped back and forth. It was as though everything was growing by itself.
As you might have guessed, I’ve changed a little bit since then, physically speaking.
I guess what I'm trying to say is, even though I would sometimes love to just push the writing to one side for a few hours, I can't do it. It's always with me now, and I can't really complain because I love it. I love the fact I have the opportunity to do this every day, to follow my dream (my writing dream, that is, not the one that involves Keanu Reeves and a plate of chocolate cupcakes...). I just wondered if I was the only one out there who's found themselves putting the kettle in the fridge because my mind's been trying to put together a plot for my Christmas romance when I should have been making two cups of tea...
And show me the right way and what I can do.
I'd like to thank Brian for making us a part of this wonderful event! And Brian ... I wish you continued success, my friend!
13. How would you kill off any character in 5? I wouldn’t
These are definitely the adjectives that describe the most accurately the Brazilian internet provider that is NET.
Two years after the official announcement of the child’s presumed identity, a family from Ontario gave a pair of small brown shoes to the Maritime Museum of the Atlantic in Halifax, contending they belonged to the boy.
- Super springy and elastic
ƒ How to use the Save Power Kit information guide.
LTE/4G- TIM reports profits up 30%, will bid in Brazil’s 4G auction: TIM is participating in today’s Brazilian LTE auction… bit.ly/IExdJF
BRAZIL (blurred)
“Æla literally means “puke”. Æla plays Icelandic punk rock. Audience in concerts have advised the band members to get health insurance due to their wild stage act, especially their front man who repeatedly jumps to a chair he always brings along. If he spills your beer, don't take it personally. Æla sound is influenced by Iceland old punk bands, like Purrkur Pilnikk and Þeyr but also more modern bands like Shellac and Modest Mouse. Æla is now finishing recording their debut album and was released in 2006. Æla were on Dr. Gunni's top five for Iceland Airwaves 2004 Æla's off-kilter blink-and miss-it songs go off like a firecracker. Their set at Airwaves gave people a chance to see Iceland's peculiar brand of punk rock up close and personal.” (Drowned in Sound)
Note: I received a review copy of this cookbook from the publisher, but I was under no obligation to write a review, favorable or no. My comments are, as always, completely my own.
Harry Klein
Scrub Pines
570 **D-IV/7/1968. “Martin Luther King and the Soul of America.” Basic Program Weekend Conference, The University of Chicago, Starved Rock State Park, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1977(5), above, pp. 802-04, and in Item C-1999(16), above, pp. 511-14.)
and faster than anyone thought
I refuse to go to a gym. I can't stand the boomboom music (we have a gym which is a tenant at work. Also a karate school. I avoid the place....)
Only Dave Lee Travis can tell us, for it is he who's our guide into strange realms tonight.
For equestrian students, 50 school horses are available on campus and the school boasts IEA national championship teams in the hunt seat discipline from 2007 and 2010. (Coach Ann Hanna told me that, at their first trip to Nationals, a woman from Boston asked her, “Where are you all from?” When Ann replied, “Colorado Springs,” the woman said, “But I thought you only rode western!”) It’s a great equestrian facility – three outdoor arenas, one covered arena, and a traditional indoor for the winter months with lots of riding space. The barn is typical of those west of the Mississippi – very open and airy without a lot of fancy wood paneling or decorative stall markers. It’s all highly functional and the horses are all happy and healthy.
And to him who lacks might (the will to overcome difficult circumstances) He increases power.
(4) Emma Smith Louis Henry Jr.
Well, so. Here. I did this for you. For free.
2 paranormal adult romances
Before the doors opened for the Ramstein event, owner Greg Zaccardi gathered the brewery's volunteers and thanked Bryan for his dedication to High Point, presenting him with personalized 2-liter, German-style growler.
then, in asking the workers to place their faith in the tender mercies of the AWL's friends in the Capitalist State, they should ask Miners from the time what they thought of having Maggie Thatcher for a boss!!!
Stephen Colbert just made fun of me. Ok, not me specifically (maybe one day) but the attendees of LA’s Pheromone Party. In the hopes of finding a mate, attendees sleep in the same shirt for three nights and then place them in Ziploc bags. You bring your bag to the party, and it’s anonymously labelled, pink numbers for girls and blue for boys. Then everyone gets down to sniffing the shirts. If you find a scent you like, you take a picture with the numbered bag. The pictures are projected around the party, and if someone sees their number on the screen and thinks you’re cute, they will approach you. All these many steps and instructions obscure the fact that, as Colbert put it, you’ve resorted to smelling old shirts in order to get a date. Of course the good news, when you come to that realization, your head’s already in a plastic bag, and you can just seal it right up. Believe me I thought about it.
Add the cornmeal, scallion, parsley, paprika, garlic powder, dry mustard, kosher salt, pepper, brown sugar and 2 tablespoons of the barbecue sauce to a medium bowl. Stir to combine. Add the ground chicken and use your hands to gently mix the ingredients together until incorporated. Set aside the remaining 3 tablespoons of barbecue for brushing the burgers as they cook.
7.Don’t get angry or stressed, even over small things, it only makes your day unpleasant. Unexpected and unwanted things happen, that’s life, and the people around you understand that. The most important thing to do is manage failure. Make sure the relevant supervisor knows about the risk before it happens, and take a step back to come up with a rescue plan. Own the solution.
Thanks to the magnificent Tip Jar Hitters, I have just enough to cover what I was told is the estimated price for the surgery, hopefully there will be no complications that would make it cost more. If you have a buck or two to spare and would like to help me either to have a cushion for 'just in case' or to buy some mushy comfort food to enjoy later, it would be greatly appreciated.
So... What's the big allure with Bruce Lee Porter? You got me! I'm sure Bruce wouldn't appreciate it! It's a big Robust Porter. period. I sampled this beer at Bailey's tap house in Portland. It's creamy, silky and smooth. Big Coffee and Chocolate that lingers on the tongue. Hops are WELL balanced! Wow! What a novelty in the NW.... Maybe that deserves an award in itself. A brewer that has enough brewing skill to actually balance a beer! here's the thing.... Have you had a similar tasting beer in your lifetime of beer drinking? ABSOLUTELY! Can't make the top of any list if tastes familiar in any way. A great Porter is a great porter, but Earth moving Zen enlightenment? Come on Jeff. If the Doc is judging beer to style the game changes. If picking a beer that's best of the year..... Not going to be something I've tasted before.... It has to be unique. Nothing unique for that year? There's no TOP beer of the year.
Names like Ryan Leaf, JaMarcus Russell and Joey Harrington come to mind before Tebow. Colt McCoy, Andy Dalton, Rex Grossman, and as much as it pains me to say this Matt Leinart are not as good as Tebow.
Yeehaw! Back to the Studio folks! Suitibly situated for text typing, and talk talkin’! Summer has been making me a dancin fool, and hopefully today’s spins gets your feet tappin’!
Please don’t think that I’m suggesting that we shouldn’t honour the fallen. They did what they believed to be the right thing and far too many of them paid far too great a price. We know that. We do acknowledge that. But we find it hard to get teary about Laurence Binyon‘s For the Fallen, from which is recited a verse every Anzac Day and every Remembrance Day. For starters, Binyon was English. He had a right to rave about how wonderful England was and what glory there might be (dubious, in my opinion) in dying for her. We’re more inclined to side with Zora Cross:
"Trust," she said. "Don't fight it. Some things are meant to be."
Fatima fumbled in the nightstand drawer and took an identity card .
That's where the idea went bad. But then, I remembered that I had scored a couple of baskets on sale at Michael's for $2.99 each that I was also going to use in the cabinets to corral some of the items!
Social welfare policies, on the other hand, are still under the control of the individual European states. As a result, Third World immigrants — many of whom subsist on state payments — tend to move to where the welfare programs are the most generous. The largest concentrations of Muslims are thus found in the big cities of Germany, the Netherlands, Britain, and Sweden. The country borders within the EU behave like permeable membranes between plant cells, with the osmotic pressure of welfare regulating the flow of rent-seekers from one country to another.
it's a vicious cycle, people. I'm eating all my words, when i was a single onlooker to moms with picky eaters.
18. That's All Right
As the book started out with the the muggle world but really it was Voldermorts scene I was excited. Voldermort was still weak but he was getting in his appearance and making himself known. Soon he would find his way to become whole again which is what is all feared. I like the scenes with Voldermort because they are intriguing. We have our hero and now our villain who are completley different but have that connection, a connection that holds so much more to the story.
Me, who does a bit of everything (except poetry and porn), hence my course name for next year's Writers' Holiday - Butterfly Writing.
You can find a recipe for just about anything on Pinterest. Visit our Pinterest boards and look for the one titled “yummy.”The original source always appears so that you can look up any recipes you are interested in.
poor, so the library was a big source of entertainment. And since I was shy, writing was one way for me to express myself. I wrote a silly poem in the fourth grade that my teacher submitted to a contest in the local paper. When I won, it was the first time I felt as if my writing had merit. I admire teachers in general, but good teachers, the ones who take that extra step to encourage
03. The Nighttime is the right Time - Ray Charles / 3:28
The next point I’d like to say is the pitiful life of the idol.
b. vs. “Meditate” on God’s statutes
The death of a parent would disturb any fifteen-year-old, but for Mark Anthony Ryser it throws him beyond the threshold and into the world of the dead. There he must find his dead mother, defeat Phasma and rescue his best friend. On top of it all, there is no guarantee that he'll ever set foot in the physical world again, or if his body will be waiting for him when he returns.
Annoyingly this has proven more difficult than previously though as there's very little on ive not tryed thats on the bar and the two new beers have failed to inspire me to write up anythin more than a mention (Tempest pale ale and hardrock curious) although they are very tasty beers im looking for as a friend recently commented on her coffee in the morning ''tasted like a kick in the teeth''. Obviously in the best way possible.
WINEMAKING PHILOSOPHY: “I focus on structure and balance. I like to think of wine as a table with many legs, each leg representing a different component – alcohol, tannins, fruit, acidity, body, etc. It doesn’t matter whether your table is 2 feet tall or 10 feet tall, as long as it’s all in balance.”
This book is about a man, Timothy Carrier, who is mistaken as a hit man and given ten thousand dollars and a woman’s picture to kill her. When the real killer arrives, Tim gives him the ten thousand as a no-kill fee and keeps the woman’s picture, saying that he changed his mind and didn’t want her killed.
Roasted Kabocha squash pieces
marry her. Pamela later left that marriage to become the wife
So here is my menu plan for this week. it's actually already Tuesday in Sydney but my blog doesn't seem to know that yet so maybe I am not technically late yet.
I’m writing this in the hope that others will hear him.
The police showed up and just looked. An employee from the hog barns just east of me, showed up and looked. The landlord flew into the driveway and immediately drove to the propane tanks to shut off the flow of propane. Someone handed me a cell phone, it was the manager of the hog barns:
Leah skin – Contessina D: Glam Affair 9at the Gallery Gift Shop)
She moans
Q: Why did Michael Jackson place a phone call to Boyz-2-Men??
She explained: ‘I think that there’s complacency and apathy throughout our country, and we think the Environmental Protection Agency is going to come and save our butts on these types of problems’.
yacht event.
On 6th August 2010 disaster struck the Himalayan region of Ladakh. Flash floods transformed the picturesque landscape into a disaster zone, destroying vital infrastructure, houses, schools and medical facilities. More than 200 people died and 1000 families were left homeless.
I was glad that we had some rice in the pantry, and sliced up a couple of the tomatoes from last week's grocery shopping trip to round out the meal. Desert was (what else?) leftover birthday cake.
"Really? I thought that would be the best plan, considering how fuzzy and cute they look." Abby swiped at the first brave beast that pounced at her. She sliced it in half and it fell like mush to the floor.
Fred Buechner said about the Christian Scriptures – it’s "not too good to be true, it's too good not to be true." As far as I can tell, nothing like this ever actually happened, but it should have . . . and it most certainly has in countless imaginations. The scene involves Chief Joseph One-Song, an apparently fictional Ojibwe chief who, as one character put it, "knew how to make a statement." In the story Chief One-Song is invited to speak before the U.S. Congress in January
No mention this week of where she acquired the postcard.
On the way up the stairs, Ann stopped him. “Just want to warn you. You’re not going to see anything good in there.”
Not everyone from last night will be attending next week, so there is room for others. Do let me know if you wish to attend next Tuesday.
The Prey by Linda Howard ( audio)
He’d gone on to explain about how the ley lines were connected to the Wells and with her standing on a ley line he could draw power from the well if he needed to. He seemed so enthusiastic about the whole thing . . .
I have to moving on
They can’t.
The agreement should provide conditions giving the licensee the right to disclose any portion of the know-how. Any restrictions the licensor requires on disclosures within the licensee’s organization, to suppliers or to customers would be included here. The agreement may spell out the basis on which disclosures can be made to include a requirement that the licensee execute agreements with the pertinent employees and third parties.
6. I have a ton more aquaintances than actual friends. I think I may only have one good friend but I keep her at a distance and we see each other maybe once a month. I use the excuse that I don't have the time but this problem with friendships dates way back.
elephants at the carnival (:
1/2 cup chicken broth
deep into
I can’t rate higher than 2. Movie would be 4-5.
Thyme, 1/2 teaspoon (dried)
Sonata : This weekend was all about memories . We went down to Gent on Friday afternoon for an early funeral on Saturday morning and were immediately swept back to 1980 . The centre of the city has moved on , of course , all glitzy shops , elegant customers and bright lights among the medieval walls but the side streets stay just the same as always , little cafes and bistros serving Gentse stoverij and steaks the size of a baby's head , full of serious eaters and families with well behaved children . Restored , we sat for hours in a small cafe , listening to Elvis and surrounded by chunky old men , all woolly jumpers , jowels and comb-overs .
Author: Collier was a favorite of Henry Kuttner and, when Kuttner became Ray Bradbury’s mentor, was one of the authors he recommended Bradbury study. Wikipedia: “John Henry Noyes Collier (3 May 1901 – 6 April 1980) was a British-born author and screenplay writer best known for his short stories, many of which appeared in The New Yorker from the 1930s to the 1950s. They were collected in a 1951 volume, Fancies and Goodnights, which won the International Fantasy Award and remains in print. Individual stories are frequently anthologized in fantasy collections. John Collier’s writing has been praised by authors such as Anthony Burgess, Ray Bradbury, Roald Dahl, Neil Gaiman, Michael Chabon and Paul Theroux.”
I never visited the Grant before it moved, but it seems the fundamental organisation of objects in glass cases and their labelling hasn’t changed (there’s a nice A-Z of pigeonholes by the entrance that are curatable, with aesthetic echoes of Keith Wilson’s Things and Mark Dion’s Welt Wissen installation).
“What makes you think so?” he answers, bemused. “I’m a servant of the public. I’m with the government.”
Fine Polenta
Meanwhile, Kim Ji Woo and Kang Ye Sol complete Jung Yumi’s girlfriend circle, and they have their share of personal and professional problems. I think Kim Ji Woo is a shoe designer and a wife of an announcer, and her perfect life unravels when her company encounters a crisis and she learns of her husband’s infidelity.
He nobly rules from the throne passed to him by his grandfather when that king wanted to retire to the forests.
Name: Adobe Photoshop CS 5.5 Extended
A few months ago I stumbled across these images from an old Nike Ad. Personally, I had never seen them before, however, I rarely look through print media. The image I posted above is my favorite. I grew up swimming and playing water polo, needless to say, I have never had the most dainty build. Going through my teenage years, it was something that I had been incredibly self conscious about. However, as I have gotten older I have learned to embrace them and their ability to show how I am strong and fit.
For I’ve been here before
With time and use issues emerge as a natural consequence and so is the case with the Windows XP. In case a user faces such issues various online support for Windows XP are readily available at reasonable rate. Other than Microsoft Windows support for XP line of operating system, there are few more reliable organizations that offer exclusive and comprehensive Remote Support for n number of issues. Let us discuss few of such issues that are instantly taken care of and eliminated within fit of a moment. The most important five such online tech support services for Windows XP:
So what has happened amongst staff? We are more curt with each other. We are tired. We socialise less, and half of the ‘young social group’ have left. We complain about the changes to each other and build a negative feedback loop. Some, like me, have lost our positions and only work on an ad-hoc casual basis. More senior staff talk about retirement approaching. New graduates are left to sink or swim in the strong current of high turnover. Our manager seems to be the only thing holding the place together, trapped between a Department needing to make cuts, the hospital executive with a list of targets, a seemingly liquid planning process, a staff who see the goalposts move every other week, and a construction site as we expand our bed numbers.
Day 3 - Favorite Character
There are so many sentiments that would go perfectly with the image of the two woman drinking. How about "Hi! We were just talking about you..." or "We start our day with coffee, but we end it with booze."
Mark Oakes encourages us to monitor and protect what we can control about our first impressions. You CAN control what you do and say that people will see and interpret; not their thoughts. Be cognizant of those things; use them to your advantage.
She sits on the couch and opens it to find a thin, hard-covered book wrapped in a bright pink jacket. She passes her hand over the words of the title, “Mom, Because of You.”* She wonders, “Am I gonna cry?” and can hear her daughter’s ticklish voice say, “Probly.”
In the 1930s, Dr. Joshua W. Davies hypothesized that strengthening the PC muscles could improve bladder control by assisting the closure of the urethral sphincter.
On Thursday, Obama and Boehner appeared to be closing in on a deal that would have raised the debt ceiling through 2013, combined with spending cuts and entitlement reforms to achieve $3 trillion in deficit reduction.
Taking you on a journey beyond the limitations of the mainsteam, to a place where vintage rock ‘n roll can rub shoulders with anarchic post-rock.
Her breathing is growing ragged and her muscles have begun to ache horribly, and panic fills her when she realizes she has lost sight of the woman. She keeps running, each step agonizing now and every breath filled with sharp edges. The woman seems to have totally receded from view. Djoran hopes she is still moving in the right direction, running forward, feet pounding like drums, tears streaming from her eyes and small gasps erupting from her lungs. She feels more than sees that her pursuers are almost upon her, and fear seizes her completely as she flings herself forward in desperation, hoping somehow that they will pass her by in their stampede.
And stand up with Emanuel to show me how he’s growin’,
This book is truly disturbing! Oh goodness, it so is.
Grill pork in grill skillet over medium high heat about 6-8 minutes or until done, turning once.
Everybody's talking about (for some time now) the Pierre Dukan diet.
Let's see... Teresa, Bruce, Linda, Jenny & Dave -- and a very clear picture of the Mona Lisa that appeared on the back of the little Mother and returning Sun made with paint marker on construction by Spencer. Susan said he was very excited to see the Mona Lisa show up on his artwork. There was some debate around the table -- is that Mona Lisa, Jesus or the Virgin Mary? I guess it depends on which media outlet you call to share your 'miracle' find!
“Recently I’ve noticed that some of the purchase orders have been turned in without a signature on them. The signature is really important to our procedure and has to be there, so please make sure that you sign them before you turn them in.” This is a positive as it can be and is not designed to point a finger at any one person, if you need to point a finger at an individual point it in private not in public. A bad approach would be, “Some of you have failed to sign the purchase orders before turning them in, that’s unacceptable, correct it now or you will be punished!” It’s never a good idea to threaten your work group for a potential transgression. Informing the group of issues that must be improved or corrected is a positive thing to do. Announcing the consequences of a potential violation is a threat. Why threaten good employees in anticipation of a violation by a bad employee. Stay as positive as you can be, remember most employees will do what you want them to do as long as they know what it is you want. Reinforcing small issues as well as big issues on an as needed basis is part of the interaction between the leader and the work group.
Everyone was going all out this week and trying to give us something new and different to push them into the finale, and Team Cee Lo was no exception. Jamar Rogers took a break from up-tempo rock songs and gave us a softer side. He was, as always, extremely powerful and awesome–his dip to the low note at the end was amazing. The crowd went wild, and Jamar was jumping up and down with adrenaline–everyone knew he killed it. After that performance, I was thrilled, sure he would make it to the finals next week. But, it was foolish of me to discount his competition from Team Cee Lo, Juliet Simms, who closed the show with her best performance yet.
I know, crazy right?! You spend all this time learning sign language and practicing these mock situations with your fellow peers who pretend to be deaf for so long that you kind of forget that the whole reason you are even in the program is to interpret for living and breathing deaf people!
Not really too sure what they are - let's call them flower boxes :)
Here, Hall mentions a “silence” and lack of information regarding the workings of Secret Societies during the 17th and 18th century, the epoch during which the Bavarian Illuminati was active. It is during this time period that Secret Societies took action, causing revolutions, overthrowing Monarchical and Papal powers and taking hold of the banking system. Was the Bavarian Illuminati part of the Invisible Empire described by Hall? Is it still active today? Let’s first look at Adam Weishaupt and his infamous Secret Society.
I think i've grown up alot since i was a freshman.
It is usual for us to make about 5 samples each - and this time, so we covered the CD well, with no template or colour collection being left accidentally uncovered, we had a plan. We each chose 2 templates and five colour collections to choose each. Well, the reason for this post is because I never shared my samples with you.
6) All winners will be notified of the result by Friday January 13 2012.
I read some incredible news today! I haven’t been able to stop thinking about them and the future possibilities this piece of information contains.
· Proven ability to drive decisions and actions among diverse groups to achieve goals.
Having only heard about NaNoWriMo a few months ago I have to tell you there is something very exciting, yet totally FREAKING ME OUT about this whole crazy writing process. *sigh* I love it!
After arriving in Clarens
If you are interested in what we believe
I do expect the good people of Tennessee don't want their elected officials using the term "Like" or OMG or BFF or LOL or any other assorted text driven diluted excuse for the English language.
But over the last couple months, some junk got piled in our library, and it was the tough kind--like years worth of paperwork that needed to be gone through and filed. So this has been James' project, and this weekend he really did a great job and the library is nearly clean again.
Score one for the little guy and for big government.
“Sir, what was the last Hollywood action film that you watched?”
Timothy Bottoms was a regular in the series "That's My Bush!" and "Land of the Lost." His other television credits include "NCIS," on the Network, "That '70s Show," "Gideon's Crossing," "The Twilight Zone," and "The Hitchhiker." His television movie credits include "DC 9/11: Time of Crisis," "Ike: Countdown to D-Day," "Island Sons," "Perry Mason: The Case of the Notorious Nun," "Escape," "A Shining Season," "The Story of David," "Look Homeward, Angel," and the mini-series "East of Eden" and "Arthur Hailey's The Moneychangers." His feature film credits include the Academy Award-winning films "The Paper Chase" and "The Last Picture Show,"
"That's so interesting to hear what other people are going through," Brian said. "I cried myself to sleep every night for a month when I came home from my first tour. Sometimes its all you can do. When I picked up Smith's arm, I cried. You just cry and bag the arm, and finish your shift and go back to your bunk and cry. Then you sleep and get up and go to work the next day."
Ground-to-air missiles to kill butterflies? (moths) Overkill or a wise investment?
Into words
Mix the salt with the two peppers. Rub the chicken all over with the salt and pepper and let it sit for an hour.
But something was brewing inside Paragon’s reptile head. And finally to Davy he said, “The difference between me and most everybody else around here is ~ I got integrity.” With that said, Paragon sprang out of the kiva that pretty red sky morning & complained to Yahtzee, the wise desert squirrel, about everything & everybody, & even threatened a couple coyotes, & came back & started packing his bags. He’d just gotten himself kicked out of the community.
Title: COLD MOUNTAIN
It is a dangerous business — and those who play in this deadly game know the risks.
As has been previously announced, blog favorites Bitch Magnet have reformed to play at least one gig in December, at All Tomorrow's Parties in the UK. Companion to that is an upcoming reissue program, news of which was briefly on the band's Facebook page until disappearing into the ether, until today. With today's formal announcement of the reissue program on Brooklyn label Temporary Residence, it is my honor to present another blog exclusive, a very lengthy interview with Bitch Magnet guitarist Jon Fine. Jon was kind enough to respond to my out-of-the-blue request to interview him or the band for the blog, as we'd already initiated a semi-coherent series of email correspondence, but even then the graciousness in giving me more than an hour of his time - on the hottest day of the year so far, for most of the Northeast, is not forgotten.
Between us, Cynthia and I have launched twelve books (with more forthcoming :-)), so I thought the time was ripe for some observations on a launch and signing.
as my life is a long, long “strange situation” itself
Till on the haunting flares we turned our backs
And you would think that maybe if I'm feeling negative emotions more keenly, then it would be the same with positive emotions. It's interesting that I haven't noticed that suddenly I'm happier and more enthusiastic (or manic), so I find it intriguing that the anti-depressant didn't seem to affect the happy synapses in my brain.
My goal is to show my audience how great of a city Chicago is. The city has been my home for 14 years and has so many great opportunities and fun things to do that a lot of people who live there aren’t even fully aware of! This is an important goal because Chicago is great place for people to visit, especially this summer, and my website may persuade people to pay the city a visit. Additionally, a lot of Miami students actually end up moving to Chicago after graduation. This website may interest juniors and seniors looking for jobs to try to look in Chicago.
To give you a sense of exactly how big that is, I measured with my trusty measuring tape – the same tape that I use to measure around my belly all the time. 6 cm is just a little smaller than my pinky finger. So sweet! Can’t believe feet even exist in this size! And clearly, the wonton has grown, because at my 19 week ultrasound, his/her foot length was a little over 2.5 cm – they doubled in size in about 10 weeks!!!
Wingate was sick with malaria but declined to seek medical help from British Military doctors. He was afraid they would send him to a hospital in Great Britain. A local doctor gave him massive quantities of atabrine, which can cause severe depression when taken in too large a dose. It did. Wingate attempted suicide, but fortunately failed.
It’s a way of sidelining critics of liturgical tat
An elbow jerked at the door’s hard close.
I have 6 young girls coming to the party so of course i had to have pink. leopard and glitter for them, ooh yes and a bit of chocolate fudge too. Whats a party without chocolate Right?
I must admit that I received good response on my complaints to the service provider and they were very courteous too.
For inquiries, please call the CCP Dramatic Arts Division at 832-1125 locals 1606 to 1607, or visit the website at www.culturalcenter.gov.ph.
I have decided to use one of my Christmas Tildas that I had not used yet, and make a birthday card for my friend Sonia... J'ai décidé d'utiliser une des Tilda de la collection de Noël qui n'avait pas encore vu mon tampon encreur pour faire une carte d'anniversaire à mon amie Sonia:-)...
We are HUGE Cars fans in our house. It's probably our favorite Disney movie of all time. We've watching it at least 100 times, if not more. So to get the chance to go to radiator Springs and be a part of the movie is just so exciting!!!
AND ENO? What of the man that the groupies of three continents have come to know as The Refreshing Experience?
So, will you think it—that one word: resistance? Will you notice that they’ve come for our kin of polar bears and black terns, who are right now being herded into the cattle cars of industrial civilization? Will you join the others who are yearning to action? The train can be derailed, the tracks ripped up, the bridge blown down. There is no metaphor here, as any General Officer could tell us. There is a planet being murdered, and there are also targets that, if taken out relentlessly, could stop it. So think “resistance” with all your aching heart, a word that must become our promise to what is left of this planet. Gather the others: you already know them. The brave, smart, militant, and, most of all, serious, and together take aim. Do it carefully, but do it.
And then I get a glass of something like this Stone/Fat Head's/Bear Republic collaboration project: TBA. I know this beer has homebrewing DNA (I know one of the homebrewers who was involved in the early origins of the 'style'), and I have a glass poured and waiting by the keyboard, and...wow, I can smell Columbus from here and it's grabbing me...
When substantive standards as general as “the right to a balanced and healthy ecology” and “the right to health” are combined with remedial standards as broad ranging as “a grave abuse of discretion amounting to lack or excess of jurisdiction,” the result will be, it is respectfully submitted, to propel courts into the uncharted ocean of social and economic policy making. At least in respect of the vast area of environmental protection and management, our courts have no claim to special technical competence and experience and professional qualification. Where no specific, operable norms and standards are shown to exist, then the policy making departments — the legislative and executive departments — must be given a real and effective opportunity to fashion and promulgate those norms and standards, and to implement them before the courts should intervene.
Went to see Jonah Lehrer speak the other night. Thanks to a friend we got to the lecture REALLY early and got seats. We later heard the line went out the door and down the block--most didn't get in.
The image in the mirror is not real. It is a reflection. More than that, it is only a reflection from a particular point of view: yours. What you see depends a lot on how you’ve positioned yourself in front of it, and also a lot depends on what you think about what you see. The angle, the lighting, and the proximity have a lot to do with it. But one thing is for sure, in spite of similarities, what you see is not the same as what other people see when they look at you.
Emily Innes
Have you ever met that Christian….you know who I am talking about…the one that has all the answers and is rather pushy with faith. The one that is arrogant and acts like it regarding their belief. We have all met them. We don’t like them, we secretly wonder if they know something we don’t know… but basically we view them as the ones out there in the deep end. The media calls these Christians radical and fanatic and they are the ones that give the rest of us Christians a bad reputation.
They might fall into some similar categories, but they won't be any that are exactly the same. This means I'm going to count up 3,650 blessings.
And later this month I'll be having an auction on eBay of my nautical themed artwork.
And for you....
Seriously, fuck this show.
Rashae is my middle name; I use it all the time! I started TBA around 1 1/2 years ago as a project for church. It's turned into something so much bigger though. I've been homeschooled since the middle of 6th grade. At the moment I'm 14 and a Freshman. I've got an older sister, two older brothers, and a younger sister. I live on a farm, and 11 acres.
Well, for a given value of ‘explanation’.
On the way back home, we stopped to view the other grand prize, which is a home in a posh neighbourhood in the city. The big thing here is building areas with little 'lakes' that the houses back on to. Of course, if you don't fence in the yard, this means you have gazillions of Canada geese crapping all over your yard and getting cranky if you shoo them away. (Having a Border Collie dog would come in handy.) It's a lovely home but ultra modern in style and decor, which really didn't appeal to me. But hey, I'd live in it if I won it! Might sell it after a year, though. This is a million dollar home, after all. The 'cottage' is just under a million ($925K). The cottage I would keep, the house I'd probably sell, if I won one of them. Nice to wander through them and have a look and dream the dream!
Tonight I have band practice with Creamery Road. A country/classic rock band from my hometown. One of my friends asked me to try out playing bass with them and it has worked out very well so far! It is another form of release for me where my heart and soul pours out in music through my fingers. Every Wednesday I can preverbaly slit my wrists and drain myself all over the floor. Everything came together very quick and smooth, I just fit in place.
Its a sunny day today.... looks like the gardening might win over the craft room...*sigh*
In the LO I wanted to have a soft dramatic color play effect. I Used in the fore ground PP 7gypsies PP called "Walker". I so loved this paper and the color play going on. Of course there is those fab butterflies in it too! Then of course I also had to mix in a little Fabscraps pp to kinda keep it all grounded with so much color going on! The Fabscraps PP is called "Heritage rose". I colored the prima flowers with Tattered angels "Seven Seas" this is really a more torquoise color. In the picture taken of the LO it looks like a deep blue. I also used it on some of the Petaloo flowers that I used. Colored the letters which are also Tattered Angels mistables. Then I really went nuts on the Back ground PP with a bunch of colors that I pulled out of the PP of 7gypsies. I made some of Denise's tissue flowers with the tissue that I used to make the BG paper. In the center of those I used Prima Say it in crystals. Also used them behind the "Dream" part of the title. The smaller part of the title I used Glitz tiny letters. I also used a Lablanche stamp in the lower right corner. Dusty attic butterflies and rose vine I misted as well. Then to finish it out a MS punch around the edges. Here is a close-up of the BG paper I made also the blooms I colored.
(and ... yes ... only one glass of sherry was consumed
The secret: walk in the gate
By taking action and sharing the link through social networking when you are finished (the options will be there), you spend one minute to contact your local state senators with a pre written letter saying that you are against this!
The situation was borderline ridiculous…I must admit, I did chuckle silently to myself once I got back into the warmth of my car. The clock struck 11…what had happened? I had been here at night on several reccy’s, no problems…open porch, no lights…Epic Fail!
I have to answer, that we couldn't figure out
is enough to bring on rain, or sun, or night
Other: woodgrain impression plate (PTI), twine, block letter alphabet die set (PTI)
So I don’t follow too very many tv shows regularly. I watch Face/Off, Project Runway All Stars, and now, RuPaul’s Drag Race. Trashy? Possibly. Addictive? Hellz yes. How can you not love drag queen divas? I don’t usually watch Drag Race, because my drama filter is set pretty low and can’t stand watching people be mean to each other for half an hour. But damn do I love Willam for busting out a Magellan reference. Sharon Needles is still my favorite, but she definitely moved up my list for that
If the answer to any of these questions is 'yes' then YOUR PLACE IS ON THE SIDE OF THE FUCKING ROAD. STAY OUT OF THE TRAFFIC LANES.
I never realised until a few years ago how neat, orderly and controlled everything in my life was - apart from the whole moving house every year or so which almost drove me nuts but kept Sidekick happy. I suppose I should have guessed that I'm a bit of a control freak, seeing as I'm a librarian. But there is still a bit of the rebel about me.
Jesus told his disciples that they were witnesses of all that had happened. They had seen Jesus suffer and die; they had seen him appear in a room as flesh and blood, able to eat fish. They were also witnesses to what life was like under the rule of King Jesus. They had seen him interact with people like the young man whom Steve Chalke talked to, people who had got stuck in their stories. They had seen how Jesus had got them unstuck and given them a new story.
Seducing the Governess was a fantastic book to Margo Maguire’s collection of novels.
-Have your sandpaper handy!! You will need to sand to make it smooth and not sharp. I had to sand for a straight 15 min almost! …Maybe more. Mine was very jagged though.
They seemed so powerful at the time.
Here is a little closeup of the debossing. I used an old diecut tag that I was never going to use the way it was. I embossed the entire tag with yellow and then used a Heidi Swapp stamp to do the debossing. A little tidbit of info....if your stamps are stained by ink it may come off on in your embossing powder, it did with me the first time. It took several more layers to cover up the ink but I think that may be due to the light color of the powder. I had planned to deboss Sophie's name but it didn't look quite right, so I stuck with just the crown. I also stamped 2 crowns and added to the page as well.
12. Watch every Paul Rudd movie: Duh.
Light is beaming down upon you now in frequencies and strengths never available to you before. As you join in your world-wide visualizations this full moon, join it in your hearts and shine it onto all the places which come into your mind’s eye. Allow the full brightness of your love to wash over all that is of the old world. Allow the new shining world to emerge. See the abundance of your world shared by everyone. See your waters clean and shining. Smell your sweet air as it is swept clean. See the damage done to your dear mother, Earth, healed. Marvel at all the new technologies that are shown to you. Dance in the streets with joy and abandon. Throw back your shoulders and feel your new freedom. This will not be what you awake to tomorrow, my friends. And yet, it is exactly what you will have created. The time between this now and that now will be so short as to boggle the minds of many who do not understand.
It's been a lot of work, don't get me wrong. W has managed to tackle the plastering himself and I have to say, I'm awful proud of him and how well it turned out. Honestly, we probably have saved upwards of £500 for all the work that we've done ourselves.
We laugh and play
9 Good-Bye
And the best news of all is, fund-raising is not only already IN the works and happening behind the scenes, but Mission 3 will not have the gap between Missions that the first and the second one did. We plan to get started very quickly after the first of the year putting our third, and hopefully best thus far, effort forward.
“You need to know about that Forest, Son.” My Father told me, his voice solemn. “When a Boy comes of age, he must go into the Forest on his own, he must try to survive out on his own, as long as he can, and if he can, he must try to make it to the other side of the Forest.
The first version of Mellow Candle: Alison, Clodagh and Maria White
Here's one possible way to solve it. Choose some easy numbers for the distance they travel, for the speeds, and for the time in case of Frank.Then just calculate!
When: Thursday, December 17, 6:00PM to 10:00PM
I could get really technical and describe the interaction of the characters in your plot to be like the threads of execution that occur in a computer operating system, but I'm afraid that unless you are a software engineer, that doesn't really help.
using the HC daisy patch die i cut 6 large, 4 middle and 3 small daisies from double sided pattern paper. then i embossed the petals, assembled the flowers, added a button to the middle and tied the layers together with green hemp cord.
There are many wonderful “weeds” that we can find easily in most yards, gardens, fields or roadsides that are actually very helpful, nutritious plants. A few of our family favorites are, wild violet, dandelion, horse radish, mullein, plantain and chickweed.
With the increasing power and availability of highly mobile advanced electronics like tablet computers and smartphones, a trend toward incorporating these devices into the everyday flow of foodservice is rising on the horizon. Their mobile nature allows for unique modes of interaction between customer and server, front-of-house and back. From iPad POS systems to check-ins to mobile ordering, here are some of the stories in the news we’re following. There are so many that we’re going to return for a Part 2 soon to focus on tech in POS exclusively. Add your own in the comments, or let us know what you’ve seen!
Oh, go on then: “Sometimes. Just sometimes, you feel like everyone else knows something you don’t. And when you find out what it is you realise how far down the grapevine you really are. Take Chet Barker, he’s a jobbing actor working in the seedier side of Hollywood who takes every underpaid and dermoralising job his ‘agent’ can find for him and he attacks them with the all the gusto of a farmboy fresh from the country. He’s about to realise what a dog eat dog world the Hollywood acting industry really is… Featuring Judge Reinhold as Chet, Eddy Murphy as his agent (and pimp-at-large)and with some truly remarkable cameos this is hilarious fun for all the family.”
DIP: Combine all the ingredients in a medium bowl until very smooth. Serve with donuts. Makes 4 servings.
i bought it at american signature home, and i believe i paid around $120. i have since seen this exact same mirror on random online retailers, and it is always near $500, so i know i got a steal!
“We can now confirm that the person in question (Angelo Marc Jandugan) is not currently a Deutsche Bank employee.”
poetic bullshit
for now i read your letters.
donkey or horse
4. When she’s sharp, I ask her to remain still, and keep her chin on the Cstand.
As I followed him into the brown forest of Missoni, I asked: “What type of jazz music?”
"Sebastian...Seb..."
Until 1825 all marriages and burials in the borough had to be performed in St Mary's. In the church grounds, the headstones show how varied the trades and professions in the town were in the 18th and 19th centuries: an inn keeper, a rope maker and a glass cutter lie close to the grave stone of William Hawks. Hawks was an important figure in the development of Gateshead's industrial prosperity and one of several notable residents buried here.
Merpel notes a curious parallel between trade marks and patents: just as many people who would ban genetic modifications of life forms seek to prevent the granting of patents for them, so too would many people who would ban smoking seek to destroy the trade marks and trade dress that protect them. If the object of the exercise is to make people stop smoking, surely the best way is to ban it rather than to turn cigarettes from a branded product into a commodity?
Travel to any other non-White country in the world and it is the same. It doesn’t matter if the country is rich or poor, no anti-racist groups are in those countries demanding they become more diverse, ie a minority in their own lands.
Don’t forget too, that 70% of an officers time is ‘paperwork’ related, because of the replication of details, written, typed, sung, danced, and written again, all because we have to cover all angles of attack and having to justify our existence that we are needed to keep our society safe and away from harm.
That very fitting F. Scott Fitzgerald quote was used to close the rerun of Law & Order: Criminal Intent I watched last night. The episode was about a love story that ended with a poor sap being killed by thugs when he tried to be the hero who saved the girl, and the quote stuck in my mind because, beyond being the perfect line to end the show with, it also spoke volumes to me about the emotional roller-coaster I’ve been on for the last few days.
Personally I asked myself, when did it become tolerable to substitute real food with canned, processed peaches and precooked, just heat chicken? I am not entirely sure but I know it was there when I was in school a few moons ago. I do know that the sad reality is that just like for us parents, it is cheaper and time efficient for schools to pick less healthy foods to buy and serve, than healthier ones. A recent piece on school lunches at the National Public Radio website discussed why schools opt for processed foods over fresh and it often comes down to time and money. Gone are the days of hand pressing hamburgers or peeling potatoes. It requires less staff and skill to take something out of the box and reheat it than make it from scratch…or does it really if you factor in the health consequences?
Grab some popcorn and enjoy the show!
Today is the last day of the free promo. At just before 10 a.m. EDT, Safe Harbor is now #217 in the Kindle Free Store, and holding at #10 in Free Suspense and #12 in Free Thriller. I’m aiming for the top place in Suspense and Thriller by the end of the day. And for the top 100 in the Free Kindle Store.
10:30am-3:30pm
(in retrospect, we should have added more and made it thicker, especially where the meadow and pond met, Rae did mention this in her tutorial, click the link above to see her tutorial, I thought we had it covered but not quite)
May you never be Shadow, human child.
postcards will be mailed saturday BECAUSE i waited so long and now i've decided to include something from savannah for everyone. and i have an art project to send off. (yes, robyn, i am that slow this week!)
But, still….
Like bumbling interstate tourists we hopped on the tram towards Toorak, barely realising our poorly timed journey until a tidal wave of school boys engulfed us in a jostle of elbows, machismo and oversized schoolbags.
- Western wages have plummeted so low that a two-income family is now (on average) 15% poorer than a one-income family of 40 years ago. The Street
This is a book that men may want to read because it shows female interiority?
Apple vinegar, aloe vera and lavender oil too, help bade a good bye to those nasty pimples. But whatever you do, please do not pop the pimple! If the redness is what is becoming a thorn in your eye, an ice compress can help in getting rid of pimple redness. If you are thinking of getting rid of pimple scars, olive oil, aloe vera (again), honey, rose water and sandalwood and the Asian favorite Multani mitti are great options for acne scar removal.
The chalkboard measures 30cms x 30cms.
And as my mind unweaves, I feel the freeze down in my knees
*I cannot prove this statement. Sue me.
he prefers a bit more ‘original’ sex you should do everything to satisfy his needs including utter objectification and submission. You will love it even though he might ask you to sign a several-page contract that allows him a complete control over your life.
Mix the ingredients for the sesame dressing in a bowl using a whisk or fork.
So, basically –
Blatant schadenfreude for anyone who's ever looked at the Westbro Bastard clan and thought "I wish they would shut up." Trawling the Internets for sex, three horny American teenagers happen across a Craigslist-like website where a local lady promises to do the lot of them at once. I'm not sure why that would appeal to anyone, but the lads are thrilled. They jump in their car and take off to the woman's trailer forthwith. So far, so Inbetweeners. It's also schadenfreude, then, for anyone who's ever looked at a horny teenager and thought "DIE."
* * Copyright (c) 2010, Chris Laforet Software/Christopher Laforet * All Rights Reserved * * Started: Jun 18, 2010 * Revision Information: $Date$ * $Revision$ * * The contents of this file are subject to the Mozilla Public License * Version 1.1 (the "License"); you may not use this file except in * compliance with the License. You may obtain a copy of the License at * http: * www.mozilla.org/MPL/ * * Software distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" * basis, WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, either express or implied. See the * License for the specific language governing rights and limitations * under the License. * * The Initial Developer of the Original Code is Chris Laforet from Chris Laforet Software. * Portions created by Chris Laforet Software are Copyright (C) 2010. All Rights Reserved. * * Contributor(s): Chris Laforet Software. */ import java.io.ByteArrayInputStream; import java.io.ByteArrayOutputStream; import java.io.File; import java.io.FileInputStream; import java.io.IOException; import java.io.InputStream; import java.util.ArrayList; import java.util.HashMap; import java.util.List; import java.util.zip.ZipEntry; import java.util.zip.ZipInputStream; import javax.xml.parsers.DocumentBuilder; import javax.xml.parsers.DocumentBuilderFactory; import org.w3c.dom.Document; import org.w3c.dom.Element; import org.w3c.dom.NodeList; public class ParseXLSXTestbed
Salvation Army tends to be like McDonalds. Remember those signs “1 billion served”? Maybe the signs are still there. With changing numbers. We serve families at Christmas. So, in typical Army fashion, we will serve more families next Christmas.
0utsider, with cupped hands
I appreciated Laurie Peel's entry: A haiku praising my haiku about how to write haiku. But it had nothing to do with robots, so she's out.
I know I've seen advice about when to change needles and clean & oil your machine--all of the advice I've seen says 'after such-and-so many hours of sewing' or 'after each project.'
The comprehensive school reform models in the schools were kind of like my raw, vegan foods. The reform program started by inputting the basics.
There are portals of energy within the air that we can link up to. Bear with me as I try and share what I see visually here. This is so new and currently, way over my head!!
It is by no means easy to secure the proper development of centres ; where an estate or district develops slowly there will always be some tendency for those interested in the various semi-public buildings, such as places of worship, shops, & to take short-sighted views of the future development, and to insist on placing these buildings on sites adjacent to the first groups of houses built, so that it may easily happen that only to a limited extent can the centre be developed in the way originally intended. Nevertheless, it is well that the centre should be fixed and form the main feature of the plan. It is probable that in the full development of the scheme other public buildings whose requirement was not foreseen may help to fill up the centre, and as the public become somewhat accustomed to the use of foresight in the laying out of towns and suburbs, they will the more readily come to acquiesce in the placing of their public buildings on these pre-arranged central spaces.
Its not really a choice. Its my destiny, she is my destiny.
Ahlers responded, “I think that race relations in our country is a hot button issue right now and I think they just punish first and figure it out later.”
I just love it. All the sections are popped up on Jody boosters (also a new love affair ;)). Incidentally this patterned paper is from the Paper Heart 6" x 6" pad from Crate Paper. Here is a look at the inside of the card with another sentiment appearing with the Sweet Stack Labels Die-namics and the larger of the new Oval Open Scallop Doily Duo Die-namics.
When did sister smile no more and Mother turn away?
125g caster sugar (I used half caster/half brown)
Brads-Stampin' Up, and unknown
For my project, I used Amy Jo's favorite colors of black, white and hot pink and one of her favorite themes, fashion, to create a purse!!
Can we make that journey into the third heaven, beyond the atmosphere, beyond the furthermost nebulae and live eternally in that heaven with the body in which we live today? Israelwould be on earth and they required no physical change. But we will need a glorified body and that is not told us in prophecy. It is, as Paul calls it, a mystery.
Dark Destiny by M.J. Putney
I don't do grocery shopping- that's usually all the Hub's doings. But I'm a crazy cleaner.
This would state that a larger sum would have to be paid if planning consent for a higher use value were to be obtained.
Figgy pudding was never my goal. Rather I had my sights set on that elusive delicacy, the fig roll. For some reason this peculiarly appetising biscuit is unavailable in Italy through regular shops. We can find a slightly odd French version for €2.50 a packet, in motorway service stations. Surrounded by fecund figs, I fancied making my own.
I have been feeling a bit restless lately. When I do feel like this it usually means a change is coming. I hope maybe a change that will present an opportunity to move, to live in an exotic place or perhaps o somewhere in Europe, or maybe even Prague. Okay, maybe it’s a stretch, but it could happen. Perhaps then, I will have met the woman of my dreams, a true soul mate, a woman who is as beautiful on the inside as she is on the outside.
For the past 100 years, westerners have lived under the illusion that we are not united with our neighbors in a city or neighborhood by any necessary constraints. The industrial revolution has created an illusion of autonomy that’s poisoned our minds and eroded our connections to the people closest to us, geographically speaking. However, this autonomy is a mirage. We still need the aid of others, but as we have let slide the traditional connections of family and community (by which I mean our neighbors) those needs have gone unmet. Into the vacuum created by those needs step our two equally-inane political parties, each promising to fix the problem. Yet both sides are doomed to fail because they refuse to direct us back to the people that most naturally address the basic needs of human existence.
Method to prepare:
-The little story on the left: Since they had filmed a music program before they shot for An An, the members were all so tired. SOL nearly fell asleep when we were taking the photos. T.O.P was like a good hyung, he tried to wake him up and said naughty things with VI. Then SOL fell asleep again and was waken up again by T.O.P… this wet on repeatedly. T.O.P was really the one who created the atmosphere of this photo shoot.
He therefore that will be saved is must think thus of the Trinity.
There is a trend in marketing toward the need for being a team player, not just within the marketing organization but, for CMOs especially, across the entire scope of the business. In a post I recently wrote that details the findings of IBM’s Annual Global CMO Survey, a key finding was that the role of a CMO has become more strategic and collaborative across the organization; however, compared to other C-level positions there continues to be a high turnover rate for most CMOs as they adjust to the changing environments of business.
8. Bubblegum Girl
Out of desperation, Wong drank his own pee and tried to carve “sorry mom” into his arm with shards from his glasses. (Since he survived kidney failure, I hope he makes a dark comedy out of this situation. Just kidding, that’s horrible.)
Turning up at a wedding of strangers in inappropriate clothes isn’t ‘me’. It’s the sort of situation where I feel very underconfident.
Canon EOS 20D, 400mm, f/6.3 at 1/320s, ISO 400
Last week, there was a story running through the news.
I enjoy listening to my one CD of Piaf's work. I hope that you will enjoy her voice, too.
What do I see?
By this point, she figured she was probably dreaming or something. "Every year? That is quite the awesome ritual."
Fact is, Old World’s beers evolve. Two weeks ago Matt made a note on the beer menu indicating that the Dark Knight was now rating a higher abv percentage than originally advertised. An early attempt to brew an IPA got out of hand as I recall but it was interesting to stop in from week to week and taste how the beer was developing and changing. To those who still crave consistency, my advice is for you to go down to the corner swill house and order a Coors, Miller or Pabst – just don’t expect the barkeeper to allow you to taste a free sample before you plunk down your bucks. So far the guys at Old World will set you up with a taste of anything you fancy trying before you pay for a full glass.
Battles first erupted on Saturday between residents of the rival neighborhoods after security forces arrested Shadi al-Mawlawi, an Islamist, on alleged charges of belonging to a terrorist organization.
Remove lemon and garnish with the remaining green onions before serving. You can also sprinkle some hemp seeds on top for some extra nutrition.
The gossip grapevine tells me that local solicitors are tooling up with the gizmos to allow them to deal with electronic files at court, and the potential savings are tempting.
If there’s one thing that cannot be criticised it’s the performances. Manville is one of the most underrated actresses and I personally feel that she’s of the Meryl Streep caliber and just not known for it. She’s wowed me in a lot of her collaborations with Leigh and I still firmly believe the Oscar should’ve gone to Manville last year for her standout performance in Another Year. She’s fantastic here and all of her character’s drama can be portrayed in one facial expression by this fine actress. Ruby Bentall is a force to be reckoned with as Victoria and her hostile character comes through. I had never heard of her prior to seeing this production but she’s a young actress that needs to be watched. Lastly, Sam Kelly is breathtaking in his role and incredibly memorable.
While the pies are tasty, the accompanying drink choices don’t give me much to shout about. Edinburgh Gold from Stewart Brewing is the best out of a mediocre bunch – at least offering up something from an Edinburgh-based brewery.
Are you thinking of making a change? Have you changed your path? Feel free to share your experiences by commenting below.
Make your mistakes, next year and forever.
Roy Wood: Forever
"A man has been murdered and children were terrorised. Here is the forensic proof. How can police leave it on the scene?"
I did mention something when my (reluctant) helpers
He asked me about 6 questions and then told me to send my dossier and my passport to Los Angeles and wait for their review and approval. So, there I was, without a passport, hoping they would send it back to me with my visa in time to catch my flight to Paris in less than 6 weeks.
Thanks to the many folks who wrote in about this hilarious story. You guys sure do make reporting the Dachshund News easier! 'Rosco P. Dog' from Lee's Summit Missouri sends in:
Hi all ,
This is my heart’s honor.
If you use a Computer Associates anti-virus program and have been getting virus warnings after visiting my blog, never fear. Some YouTube videos, including the Spearhead one I had featured, have been triggering false positives. They are not actually infected.
Indian software market is growing 2-3 times as the global market. High untapped opporttunity for entrepreneurs. Local requirements are huge. No one has actually figured out the right strategy for the local market.
I'm staying at my gran for a week or two as my parents are in America. It's okay because I'll be going to Hong Kong later on this year :D... Also, as I'm writing this they are enduring a 30 hour by airplane flight. So, not to be mean but *bahahahaha* :P
Ask anyone who has come through tragedy and made the best of it, and you will find some version of this same wise counsel: you need to observe and tell the truth about what happened to you; then you need to assess your options and make the best choices you can with what’s left; and then you need to observe, assess and choose again. And again and again. My friend and truly inspirational example of day-to-day choosing, W. Mitchell (who himself survived a fiery and disfiguring motorcycle crash only to wind up paralyzed years later in a plane crash),
Flapping up there in the wind.
— Dietrich Bonhoeffer (1906-1945), Ethics (1949)
When I sent my email to Yarra Trams, I imagined an overworked 21 year-old on their ninety-eighth email of the day (at ten past nine in the morning) scanning my email, seeing the word ‘poo’ and bringing up the “excrement-fouled tram’ template.
(you can see him in the first picture)
Thanks to everyone for adding us! We are honored to be a regular part of your web browsing.
Wash and cut the potatoes into 3/4 inch cubes, skins on if you like.
9.) In at 9th place is another post that I loved writing it’s one of my Random Rambling posts this one talking about My Top 10 Bookish Peeves and Loves. This one isn’t a meme and so isn’t linked to anywhere. It doesn’t even really feature any books or exclusive information so it seems like people just liked this one in general for the content and writing which is a nice thought. I love writing my Random Rambling posts so it’s nice that one of them has made it into my top ten!
I work better under my own terms and by myself. It’s become painfully apparent to me, this, as of now.
The first game didn’t go too badly, we had held our own for a while until they decided to push us… and it ended up that they had a lot of forces to push with. We managed to stay alive for a while, and didn’t make it easy for them, but altogether not bad. Learned from that match that I need to make more of an army.
We will wear hats and mittens today,
So, unless you’re a beer collector, skip this one. This stuff pours with a pitiful head and insignificant beading. Little wonder Moe keeps it in the back room. The only up side is that the price runs about a buck a bottle…or about 10 times the 1933 price!
The Collected Stories of Guy de Maupassant: I'll admit that I've never been a huge fan of short stories. I always felt as if they tried so hard to be profound, and they bored me a bit. That was until I found Maupassant. I purchased an early Penguin edition, which I highly recommend. His stories are sublime, disturbing, lovely...so many words for them. The Graveyard Sisterhood is one of my favorites of his. Maupassant showed me what a short story should be, and I look forward to giving others a chance, like Salinger's 9 Stories.
"Did they get you to trade
So of course, of course the phony outrage mill gets thrown into high gear and truckloads of well-I-never's and how-dare-you's get express delivery to the dudgeon factory, and we start seeing ridiculous pearl-clutching about how basically the entire Obama administration and all of the Democratic party has just spit in the face of everyone's mom or something. For example:
Lord, give us the courage to push the boat out and enter into the deep. With your love to support us, we will brave the depths of this world and pass with safety into your care. Encourage other men and women to join us in our journey. Amen.
marked with the glyph of vengeance. This will add one to the damage he does with each successful blow of his weapon upon his opponent. The point is added after the subtraction of armor, so that he does at least a point of damage whenever he wins the opposed resolution roll.
And of course the new release is now out – you can see them all here – and I wouldn't be at all surprised if one or two of them found their way into the winner’s basket :)
“Garlic contains numerous sulphur components, including the most valuable sulph-hydryl groups, which oxidize mercury, cadmium and lead and make these metals water-soluble. (…) Garlic also contains the most important mineral, which protects from mercury toxicity, bioactive selenium.”
The grievance demands triggered a joint letter from Duke provost Peter Lange and other Duke administrators (including Group of 88’er Lee Baker, now a Duke dean). The letter gave a generic defense of academic freedom. But it also included this extraordinary sentence: “We understand how the conclusions of the research paper can be interpreted in ways that reinforce negative stereotypes.”
Drama, Rated PG, 106 Minutes
There are many people in modern paganism who assume that “syncretism” and “eclecticism” are the same thing, and they’re really not. The general distinction between them, one might say, is that with syncretism, there tends to be an overall structure and project and framework to the matter, whereas eclecticism is more like a random collection of objects on a shelf or in a box that may or may not have any particular overarching theme or purpose. Some pagans do the latter, and may do so haphazardly or irresponsibly, carelessly, and perhaps even offensively where certain practices or approaches are concerned. However, what many of them do is more deliberate than that, and at least deities from the same culture are treated in the same ritual; or, if they’re not (and there’s nothing which says they must be, other than notions of cultural purity that are probably not historically accurate, nor should they be binding on modern activities), there is at least some sort of knowledge of functionality and complementarity going on. This can make for some truly strange bedfellows (or, altar-fellows?), certainly, but perhaps not outside of the context in which such activities are going on. The religions of late antiquity, particularly in Greece, Rome, and Egypt, were highly syncretistic, and to think that there were notions of “cultural purity” even in Rome–which often had some resistance to “foreign” gods, and yet welcomed many of them into its pantheon and gave them temples quite happily from a very early period–is not strictly accurate. The Egyptian deities syncretized with themselves quite a bit before Greece and Rome were even a blip on the radar, and variant local forms of deities merged into one, or temporary mergings of different forms of deities, or entirely different deities, occurred across the spectrum. Cultures that are alive and in contact with one another mutually influence each other, and religions do likewise…and, I think it is safe to say, the gods also do likewise, and humans are sometimes lucky enough to have epiphanies of such things occurring.
Here's som Upcoming stories I may get around to that sum up my Winter Break:
As usual plenty of uni work, blah blah blah.
Take the much-heralded and then hailed ‘stress’ test ‘results’ – fiddled by Christine Lagarde in order to ‘calm’ the markets. What this has done is ensure every lender now regards the EU as a bunch of pathological liars (good call, lender guys). And lo, now the Franco-Belgian rice-paper bank Dexia is in need of a rescue. Only a few short weeks ago, it got one of the higher pass-marks from the latest European regulators’ stress tests.
Rocco B:
Jesus’ accusers had to deny the resurrection, as they do to this day. Otherwise, they would have to face that He really is God.
As I was flipping through my old basic D&D books I noticed some pencil lines around alot of characters in some of Larry Elmore's amazing illustrations (to this day, I still feel his ink & brush work from the basic books was his best). What were these pencil lines from? They are the same dimensions as the character illustration boxes from the basic character sheets. I would find the right crop, get my father to photocopy the page at work, and I would cut the image out, and tape it to my sheet. Instant Larry Elmore character art. I used alot of Elmore's work for my characters' inspiration.
During a time of civil war, Karasu Hinata is born the son of a powerful warlord. When he is still a child, his family castle is taken by a rival clan. His father and mother are murdered right before his eyes.
actual useable free time during the school year.
It doesn't matter what you've heard
I didn't make the same mistake twice. I got the Focus compilation album from the same shop and played it to death. And so my prog journey began. Sorry, not very punk, is it?
So we begin my GBV series of postings with my top 5 tracks from their 1992 LP Propeller, so named because after 4 LPs that barely sold out their 500 or 1000-run pressings in Dayton, OH, the band figured it would be the record that finally propelled them out of the middle of Ohio. Sadly, it didn't, but it's certainly not for the lack of quality songs. I think they needed a bigger label or distributor, with this same record, to make it out of the indie circuit minor league's minor league, which they didn't have for a couple more records.
March 26, 2012 at 8:38 AM
(Exodus 32:1-6, 19-20)
It is perhaps bitterly ironic therefore that Philip Nitschke (pictured) is entering Britain again this week to run a series of seminars instructing people how to commit suicide.
Anderson Luiz Dos Santos, 32, a Brazilian national was killed in a crash near Queenstown on Friday evening.
I’m remembering news headlines from a few years back (2003?)when Pete Townshend of The Who was brought before the beaks when his name was found on a list of people using their credit card details to download pornographic images of children.
Write out responses to the thematic questions related to Black Boy. Support your responses with evidence from the text.
Ok Ciao!
I like ginger tea (and if I'm desperate, hot water boiled with pieces of ginger) because it relieves the sinuses. But for something a little more fun, a hot toddy is a classic choice. (Whisky, honey, hot water, and lemon juice.... so delicious.)
Recently, an interviewer for JAM magazine asked me, "Which phrases do you over-use the most?"
My impending trip to Hanoi, Vietnam next week (we're getting away for the Lunar New Year this year) reminded me of the joys of travelling - something I need to badly remember, as my frenetic week drew to an end.
The fight back begins here.
White cardstock by Bazzill
Why should I say much? In the article that Christ is to be beneath Mohammed, and less than he, everything is destroyed. Who would not rather be dead than live under such a government, where he must say nothing about his Christ, and hear and see such blasphemy and abomination against Him? Yet it takes such a powerful hold, when it wins a land, that people even submit to it willingly. Therefore, let everyone pray who can pray that this abomination may not become lord over us and that we may not be punished with this terrible rod of God’s anger.
I try to remain calm but I’m keenly aware that I’m in over my head. My sweet, sheltered children just saw a terrible accident and now I have to proceed as if everything is hunky dory. I start talking about our own car, how me and daddy picked this particular model because of its safety record, how it couldn’t possibly roll over. I don’t dare look in the rear view mirror. If I catch their frightened eyes, I will certainly crumple.
To tell the truth, the only good thing that came out of When Time Ran Out... was the fact that Newman used the money he earned from this movie to start up his Newman's Own line of salad dressings and other food products. I like his Low-Fat Sesame Ginger dressing. This movie, not so much.
And they grab some obsolete irrelevant old law from a circumstance that no longer exists and use it as their excuse to indulge their xenophobia.
Cuticle maintenance is very important to me as a nail connoisseur of sorts. And now with it getting cold here most days (minus the 60 degree days like yesterday), it's important to maintain not only your dry skin, but your cuticles.
We should be focused on living Jesus’ Greatest Two Commandments instead of justifying our rightness based upon some doctrine-of-demons formula.
Still, why did this commissioned officer do that to his fellow soldiers? I think, rather than a trial and all that. I think they should just send him to Iraq and leave him there without a weapon.
If the monthly payment seems like something you want, you may be tempted to go ahead and sign the paper. But that is the last thing you want to do. The first thing to look at is the loan term. Is it for what you want, such as 5 years? Or is it longer? Sometimes, dealerships will give you a low price to lure you in but may fail to point out that the loan is for 7 years. In my experience, 5 years is the magic number you want to try to hit, if not lower. With 5 years, you’ll typically balance out on what you owe on the car and what the car is worth in the second or third year, which is what you want. With 7 years, you won’t hit that middle number until closer to four to five years. If something happens and you need to sell your car, you want to be as close to what you owe as possible. This will prevent you from having to owe the dealership any money when you sell or trade your car. Also, the longer you pay for your car, the more interest you will pay.
What do UK ‘thugs’ do? They usually fight each and maybe cause a tiny bit of criminal damage.
Return to Forever – Where Have I Known You Before
Judgment Day Part II – October 21, 2011
The duo promise more sounds and less defined structures in the future, and also have plans for a live act. “One thing’s for sure though,” says Anstascia. “We won’t be making dubstep anytime soon!” Anyone who loves psychedelic inflected house music will be glad.”
In preparation for the launch of Spring Black Friday, street teams became ninjas, anonymously flowerblasting various neighborhoods and communities to spread awareness. Teams of two delivered the flowerpots assembled the day before to 250 locations across six markets. Looks like they had a fun time surprising people with gifts on their doorstep!
Something in his voice—a hint of glibness—made Melanie give him a second look. He was so massive, he probably intimidated people even when he didn’t want to. Could his professed fear of snake be a bit of theater to make himself seem vulnerable so people would underestimate him?
In the passage of Isaiah that Jesus quotes (Isaiah 56:6-8), we see an interesting description of this ‘house of prayer’ that God gives:
like a song sent out over water
As always thank you for your visit and any comments you have time to leave. I really do appreciate them and love to see who's stopped by.
Taken: 10/06/2011
This little beauty is one I’ve made a few times in the limited time I’ve had the recipe. It was gyled with the pale ale but at only 1.0025 points difference they are nearly identical and you aren’t gaining anything gyling these babies up. As for the AK’s, I just love the AK’s and really do wonder why they died out like they did. The combination of grainy husky American 6-row malt with the elegant English pale malts (MO, Optic, etc) really make this beer layered. The maize is usually never enough to be ‘corny’ but you definitely get a ‘maizy’.
I tend to write a blog post every time I meet a new boy that has "potential." I have no idea if I'm jinxing myself or not by doing this, but I guess I always just have an urge to share. So it's been a while since Will. That ended in December. There have been two more guys that were more than just the casual one-time date. But obviously, they didn't work out.
Cool, huh?
It is done by the father or the mother or anyone from the People of Knowledge whose supplication is hoped would be accepted. So he should perform Tahnik and supplicate for the child as was the practice of the Companions.
As a Trainer I give my clients the tools they require to help them get to their end goals but at the end of the day I can not achieve their goals for them. They are the ones who have to put in the extra training when I am not around, they have to be disciplined with their eating and they need to be able to find that extra SELF motivation required to ensure they train hard and eat right 90% of the time to warrant them success.
My grandparent’s values gave rise to the largest middle class and the strongest economy that the world has ever known. Today, for most Americans, hard work has stopped paying off. Those at the very top grow wealthier from their investments.
Much love~
I then noticed that the other mum was, in turn, staring at my girl, which added to my discomfort. She must be wondering about my motionless child too, so I decided to praise her child before she could condole with me about mine. “Sorry I’m staring”, I said, “but I couldn’t help noticing how active your girl is, compared to mine”. “Oh”, she replied, “thanks for telling me that! I was staring myself, at the impressive amount of teeth your girl has. Mine has none”. We had to laugh, both of us.
the hearer enough information to know whether they're
(We also had help from some parents)
We went very early in the morning when the wildlife is known to be most active. We came across a group of Howler Monkeys and Spider Monkeys- all of the photos just look like trees-
5. NEVER EVER gift yarn, notions, patterns expecting it to be used for you. Do not hint that I make you something. Ask me simply and straightforward. I may or may not make it for free if you buy the yarn, or may charge you for my time… either way be proud and humble to think I would even consider doing it for you since you are too lazy to learn to do it for yourself.
At 14:59,some sound cheered us up,it was like the restoration of power.We headed up and saw the light on there and the lobby bright all of a sudden.Oh,yes!!!!!Nightmare has finally gone!We would hold a party to memorize the big moment if not working now.
When I wrote CRACKED, I dreamed of important strangers reading and connecting to it (agents and editors).
The boys here are the sons of criminals – murderers, perhaps, or men and women that couldn’t pay their taxes. Some of the boys might even be criminals themselves, arrested by the military for smaller offenses – something simple like petty theft or breaking curfew. It doesn’t matter what the offense is. Once a citizen of our satellite breaks any military law, they relinquish their rights and are sold as slaves. Those who commit particularly offensive crimes have a choice between execution and the labor camps beyond the great barrier wall.
Labels: ANC, SA POLICE, SA ROAD DEATHS, ZUMA
A laugh that was contagious
ATTENTION! If you have a problem with:
It is almost impossible to me not to express sympathy for the silly widow Mme Colet that spends a fortune for an evening clutch bag, refuse to cut salaries as recommended by her perfumes factory’s executives, and finally, after hiring a thief (in disguise) as her secretary, gives him the power to do whatever necessary to improve her business including cuts in executives’ salaries.
I recently came across an article in Time Business by Margaret Heffernan that shared the secrets of people who are very productive. I was a little surprised at a couple of the habits so I thought I would share them with you. According to the article it boils down to four things. 1 – These people have a life. The article suggests academic research keeps showing external commitments are highly correlated with high achievement. 2 – They take breaks. From what I understand when you get tired you can quickly become rigid and narrow-minded and a quick break may be all that is needed to get those creative, productive juices going again (more on that later). 3 – These people have often worked in different industries. While this makes sense to me I was surprised to see it on the list. Having a diverse background allows you to see different frameworks and approaches. We discussed this in the Diversity Enhances Productivity post from November 2011. 4 – The final attribute – these people have great outside collaborators and networks. What the article really suggests is productive people have very wide, rich resources to call on. The secret to productivity isn’t the latest tool or being better organized, it’s having a complete life.
Our song keeps runnin' on
During the days leading up to Christmas, Ticos gather for posadas—neighbors meeting at each other’s homes to re-enact the travels of Mary and Joseph to Bethlehem. During the posadas there is song, prayer, and food—especially tamales and rompope (eggnog—heavy on the rum)! Fat, juicy grapes and shiny apples load the shelves at our local grocery store. They are popular imported foods for the holidays and are a special treat at Christmas.
$18.00 at Costco
No surprises here. The imminent movie release has increased interest in this exciting read. I have multiple copies in the collection and still cannot meet the demand. Lots of boys have a reservation on this one too.
3 rose
Korres Guava Body Butter 50ml
Ahh, spring!
Egg – 1
“At times when we haven’t scored,” begins the veteran right wing, “we’ve been able to play in their end and kind of rag the puck around and make guys play in their own end. I think that’s your job. We’re not going out there thinking we’re going to score, and that’s a huge bonus when we do. Our job is to tilt the ice. And I think we’ve been pretty clear about that.”
This is the park with the squirting turtles. I drive by this park all of the time and I've been to the park only a few times, I have yet to see the squirting turtles in action. They are supposed to be a water play area but I'm not sure if people don't use it much or if it doesn't work. I didn't try it.
Cantor: oh yes Fluffy
I don't how many times I started this piece today on the arrival of the iPad and the agency model. Frankly, by mid-morning, I gave up. There was just too many deals with Amazon to report by publishers, and too many comments like:
Everyone knows when it's gift time for the dogs, Oliver gets a new toy he's interested in for maybe two seconds - if that - before going back to his tennis ball. And Davinci gets a new bed, blanket, pillow, etc. Davinci could care less for toys. He doesn't play. He sleeps, eats and watches TV.
i'm head over heels in love with industrial touches these days
They're doing the Bohemian Rhapsody thing with all the band's heads all on screen at the same time. But, like fools, they've forgotten to up-light themselves. Personally, I make a note of always being up-lit. It's the only way I can preserve the air of mystery that so fascinates the internet.
parties...
Restoring longleaf in selected landscapes and moving from 3.4 million acres of existing longleaf to 8 million acres will require coordinated and accelerated efforts on public and private lands. The Range-wide Plan includes seven strategies addressing climate change, accelerated use of prescribed fire, providing the tree and understory plant materials, and harmonizing private and public lands programs in targeted landscapes. To accomplish these goals several actions are taking place. For example,
There are multiple parts to this series on the Thoroughbreds for All Event by Stacey, so stay tuned! Below are the first two parts.
would darken it down more than it did but I still like the way it looks.
Well that's not entirely correct.
When he was finished with all the quilting, he just put the quilt into the washer and all the stabilizer disappeared.
I’ve always liked broccoli, whether raw, steamed, boiled or stir-fried. This recipe is simple, but big on taste with the tang of lemon and the nutty flavor of Parmesan to compliment the broccoli. Aunt Lucy was right all those years ago ~ broccoli is probably one of the healthiest foods in the world and it’s packed with flavor too! So, eat your
Mortified after muffing up a mummy,
LaVerne Clark vs. Brian Foster
I am a BNP supporter, and consider myself to be a nationalist, not a neo-Nazi. There is a difference! Were you aware that Winston Churchill once suggested the Tories use the slogan "Keep England white"? Google it if you do not believe me.
All the top five beer bars in Belgium offer cellar-conditioned beer. The grandfather of them all is Bierhuis Kulminator in Antwerpen. Run by Leen and Dirk van Dyck for 26 years at its present location, where they also have a good cellar. Recently they have trebled their cellar capacity here, allowing them to bring some goodies from an old cellar nearby their former café south of Antwerpen.
6. Don’t sit in the dark. Yesterday the sun was pouring into the office to the point I couldn’t see my computer screen. I shut the blinds. And then I was reading CNN news online (see #2)….and I started getting bummed out by what I was seeing on video and reading online…while sitting in the dark. So, I quit CNN.com and opened the blinds again. I needed the sunshine — especially here in Portland. So, yes, I sat at my desk wearing sunglasses so I could see my computer screen while letting the sun shine in. No, I’m not crazy. In fact, I’m staying sane.
Okay, new iPad is selling like hot cake in US for a while already. However today is the first day new iPad (or I called it iPad 2012) selling in Malaysia. And the price is the same like iPad2 before price reduce.
Some people really love trips. Some people get annoyed by the weather or the bugs. At Camp Jorn, we believe the great things about trips heavily outweigh the challenges!!
Before I can burst into more tears and ask her to be my Mom, she gives me THREE more convocations for THREE more interviews and classes I am required to take, shuffles me out the door and walks me down to the medical office....
These verses command Muslims to fight, generally and absolutely. The verses impose no restrictions or conditions. Therefore this is clear evidence that “Jihad” may be offensive or defensive.
In comments carried on Syria’s state news agency, Assad said: ‘Syria will spare no effort to make (Annan’s) mission a success and hopes it would return security and stability to the country.’
And so, the second days’ surgery was uneventful. I shared some passing remarks with the Anesthesiologist apropos some of my bad habits. From the installation of the stimulator, I was wheeled up to 4 West, rm # 406 – and, for some time while I was under anesthetic, I saw my mother, my sisters, and their respective boyfriends/husbands while I was CRACKED right out. I’m pretty sure my sister asked whether I’d be lonely, and I believe I broke into song more or less immediately…
Jesus said to him, ‘Have I been with you for so long a time and you still do not know me, Philip? Whoever has seen me has seen the Father. How can you say, ‘Show us the Father’? Do you not believe that I am in the Father and the Father is in me? The words that I speak to you I do not speak on my own. The Father who dwells in me is doing his works. Believe me that I am in the Father and the Father is in me, or else, believe because of the works themselves.
She hesitantly raised her hand and placed it in front of mine so that our palms nearly touched.
It is true that 3,000 souls were added to the church in Acts2:41and in 4:4, the number had grown to five thousand. This church was the Kingdom church not the church the Body of Christ. It is important that we understand the difference. There was a dispensational change. God’s method of dealing with man changed. The Kingdom was offered andIsraelrejected that offer. Romans 11:32,
Morning all, how are we today?
"I used to hate my body so much," Serena Kozakura, who has appeared in product commercials on television said. "But it was my breasts" that won in court, she said.
Damn, but the time really flies.
How tall are those darn things, anyway? Those big beauties, which spike across many German hillsides, range in height from roughly 100 to 300 meters, or 300 to 500 feet. The blades are a little less than 120 feet long.
But now – voila! The e-reader market is insatiable, and publishing has embraced niche markets, including the smaller traditional print houses. Writers can actually write the book-of-the-heart. It’s the equivalent of being able to do an art house film rather than trying to turn it into a Hollywood blockbuster.
The women who signed up for the Free French Forces under de Gaulle were looking for wartime battles; instead, they got sent to London to become file clerks, hostesses, maids and other support-related jobs that kept them from the front lines. Their romantic (and sometimes cynical) notions progressed, a few of them into Sapphic embraces (shown in brief gestures, passionate kisses and, for the 1940s/1950s, suggestive dialogue), some of them into heterosexual embraces - and some, like the narrator, who places moral judgments on the women she's observing.
I was just sitting here - blog stalking as i do and trying to relax as one does when work is stressful and gets in the way of having fun - to my surprise i have just received a lovely email from Tara. Now as you know I lurve blog stalking and checking out what the other crafty ladies all over this wide world of ours get up to and I found Tara's blog, now I must say - she is a wonderful creator. To my surprise I won her 40th blog candy.
May this mingling of the Body and Blood
strand by strand,
Rumi wrote: “Unkindness from the wise is better than kindness from the ignorant.”
my picture...I still don't get used to see that, feel little ashamed, but I do love it! Thank you Atsuko!
My early television memories are of Sesame Street, Cheers and the news. But as I’ve gotten older, particularly, after his show ended, I came to appreciate Fred Rogers’ impact, from saving funding for public television in the late 1960s to his considerable kindness to everyone. Nevertheless, having missed out as a child, I never felt a strong personal connection to him.
Well a few months ago I decided and blogged, about running in the City 2 Surf this year! I am not a runner, in fact I am not even a person who excercises! So two months into training, how am I going? Well I have new superfast running shoes which apparently " amplify the power of my stride" I hope that makes me faster but it doesn't seem to make it any easier. I am training, running and slowly building speed and endurance. Thankfully I still have 6 months to train otherwise they would be calling me an ambulance half way in.
I wonder why there were melon balls served alongside… anyway, the melons were really sweet but had a hint of spiciness.
Sadly, thats where the excitment stopped there this week. The only other thing thats happened was a letter from the dole peeps saying that I will won’t be getting Job seekers allowance anymore. Apperently, I had no good reason to leave my last PART-TIME job in Aberdeen. The fact that I was homeless, heavely in debt and had to move back to other end of the country wasn’t acceptable. The ironic thing is, how bad is the person who decided that at their job? I get the chance to send a letter of appeal which I’ve already written-
Ms Howarth also sold her nappies onto a friend who used them for her two children before selling them on again to someone in her family. She said: “They last a very long time and I inspired another 2 friends to use reusable ones, which felt great.”
Helping couples to deepen conjugal love and achieve responsible parenthood is part of the Church’s total pastoral ministry to Catholic spouses. Fulfillment of this ministry includes both education and pastoral care.
me: i will do my best to not let a shark eat you.
When the pie is ready, whisk an egg and coat the pie with it. Sprinkle on top the almond slices and bake the pie for an hour.
Anyway, regardless of whether we have more new music to review and discuss, I declare the effort a success for the sole reason that it has brought singer-songwriter Lydia Loveless into my auditory universe.
One project we did this year using Pages was for the Declaration of Independence. We picked a signer of the Declaration and then did some research about them. Then we wrote a poem that included all of the important information about them. The last thing we did was to put in an image of the person. I liked this project because it was fun to research someone we never knew existed before.
In fact, during his six years in Abbottabad, bin Laden was not the functioning head of al-Qaeda at all, but an isolated figurehead who had become irrelevant to the actual operations of the organization. The real story, told here for the first time, is that bin Laden was in the compound in Abbottabad because he had been forced into exile by the al-Qaeda leadership.
Please comment below if you know of any other fun experiments you can do with baby food jars!
Did you know that red bell peppers have twice the amount of Vitamin C than a single orange?
CALLER: So it's OK to say "nigger"?
a princess proved; she propped him not.
4. Element - A Galaxy Apart
I'm not qualified to judge the merits of his playing, and critical opinions vary. Billboard wrote of this album in 1960 "Brailowsky's striking technique and particular flair for Chopin's works are brilliantly highlighted on the 24 Preludes." Others were not as kind.
-Dash of salt
Snotty nosed
Activists who supported the unifying “C17″ coalition of civil society had all manner of excuses for the weak showing, including erratic funders (always true, e.g. in the US). Even huge NGOs (WWF and Greenpeace) apparently contributed only staff time but no other resources. These and other groups that served the C17 committee, such as faith communities and some trade unions, held competing events to the C17’s “People’s Space”, at locations across town, defeating the purpose of the civil society convergence.
One of lifes little gems has to be when you see the end in sight, a time when you can look forard to a little ‘me’ or ‘us’ time.
It was originally made known to the western world as long ago as 1606, when Diego de Prado reported finding specimens in southeastern Papua, while voyaging through the Torres Strait separating Papua from Queensland, Australia. The first specimen examined scientifically, however, was one that had been shot and killed by Sir William MacGregor on Mount Scratchley at 7000 ft in 1897, whose alcohol-preserved skin and skeleton were then sent by MacGregor to the Queensland Museum.
Just recently, my oldest and best friend Jimmy lost his mother Jamie Sue to brain cancer. Rather than merely sit on his haunches and mourn his loss, he's set out to actually do something about it, which impresses me more than I can ever explain. On October 10th, he will be participating in the American Brain Tumor Association's "Path to Progress Marathon"--that's a 26.2 mile run! By sponsoring him (or any other participant), you will be raising money to "support the research and patient/family support programs of ABTA." The best part is that for every dollar you donate, the Chicago Marathon will match it! So ten dollars out of your pocket is actually a 20 dollar donation to this very worthy cause.
You do it with grace, class, paying attention to EVERY DETAIL, being passionate about everything that you are doing as well as what you are saying, you are reflecting on the things that once were and trying to plan on how things can be moving forward, you find ways to re – invent yourself via mind…body…soul…and spirit….
Have you ever been to PV? What did you think?
Found an "R" written ever so neatly in ball point pen on the arm this morning as well as a side order of doggy poop smeared on E.V.E.R.Y. cushion bc it was on the bottom of Mr Big's shoe. Yep shoes on the sofa, I've thrown my hands up... Enough on that, maybe one day soon I can get another slipcover, preferably in navy:)
The Fuller Memorandum (surprise!) — a novel, set roughly eight years after The Atrocity Archives
You may consider the following faucet design, both of which provide a modern look with relaxing sensation:
We went and got giant gyros and went back to see the rest of Needtobreathe. Then we stayed at the same stage for Florence and the Machine. There were TONS of people there. I wanted to get up in the crowd, so we followed some people making their way forward. Jon and I are both short, so we couldn't see very well. Every time we saw people going forward in the crowd, we tagged along behind them. Finally we got on the rubber mat in front of the stage. We were still pretty far back, though. We tagged along with two guys and a girl and got pretty close. One guy took his shirt off and was dancing in front of me, sweaty and really into the show. I was surprised at how many guys were there really getting into the show, singing along and dancing. The shirtless guy hit me in the head with his elbow once, but he was really nice and apologized and kissed my head. Unfortunately he was really tall and we couldn't see much, although when he got going dancing and lifted his arms I had a perfect view of Francine right under his armpit.
But Pete isn't the only one celebrating because amongst the honorable mentions (I say again there were 125 entries people) were none other than the wonderful Aerin, McKoala, Laughing Wolf, Precie and … li'l ol' me! I'm all aflutter. In the words of the inimitable Bruce Forsyth; Didn't we do well?
From Park Publications in the Cotswolds, David produces three small press magazines. Scribble and Debut focus on fiction, while Countryside Tales also includes articles and poetry on a rural theme. All three magazines offer opportunities for writers to have their work published, and there are prizes to be won in a range of competitions throughout the year.
“Another example is the recent video posted on YouTube by our Imam; I challenge every Nigerian to watch that video again. There is no place our imam either said he will crush President Jonathan or issued an ultimatum to the government in Nigeria; but nearly all papers carried very wrong and mischievous headlines.”
Since this is our last week in our homeschool before Christmas, I thought my "cupcakes" and I would enjoy a break from the usual book routine and do this idea that I have read from different sources.
Utopia - Utopia was right across the street from the hotel I was staying at. It was a cute, quaint little restaurant. It was a gorgeous evening and we ate dinner outside. Good selection of food and great service!
“9 – According to Calvinism, the substitute only has limited value because it’s not applied to all men, even though it’s a perfect substitute. Somehow the father is deceived into thinking the substitute is only satisfactory for some men and not others, even though the Son was a perfect substitute. So the Father has been deceived in sending the Son as a substitute because the substitute didn’t work for some men even though Jesus was the perfect substitute. What’s a God got to do to be a substitute and perfect savior when not even an imputed exchange that is external to the sinner cannot cover all men’s sins?”
One of my new Prima flowers was a perfect colour match for the paper too, love it when that happens.... and seriously I have half a drawer full of pins, so why not use two leaves on the one card!!
I am learning
“But his death will weigh heavily on colleagues working in Pakistan and colleagues working in headquarters who ultimately make the decisions about who goes where and who does what.”
Other: Circle Nesties, SU Corner Rounder Punch, SU Button, Colorbok Metal Dots, Dimensionals
Another cause for celebration is, I'm honoured to say, my little neglected blog is being featured at 'The Decorating Forum' this week. A big thank you to the host Julie-Ann and all my readers who nominated my blog to be featured!!. I'm thrilled to take part and if you've not visited the forum before, it is a great place to catch up with other like-minded readers and to discuss and debate all things interiors and design. You'll find great inspiration, clever ideas and may even learn a thing or two.
She stood for a moment her face tightened, than softened as if she were debating with herself and reached a decision. She turned, put down the drinks, walked to the dimmer switch on the wall, turned down the lights to what Vince interpreted as a romantic glow and returned to stand, expressionless a few feet away from him.
The above layout is for this month's Scrap the Boys Challenge, I was inspired by Cathy Cafun to do some masking of some scrapware spiders I had and I think she has made me addicted to misting.....my only hope is I can become as good as her....
The impact of the film's music in creating this state of irrational anxiety can't be overstated, either. Goblin's music is as integral to Suspiria as the stylized imagery, despite the fact that the band — who had previously scored Argento's Deep Red — composed the music before seeing the film. The music just fits perfectly, becoming inseparable from the bright, creepy images. The tinkling chimes and bells of the main theme, which reappears frequently, is often joined by whispery chanting and moaning, ghastly voices that seem to be communicating with the film's characters. The word "witch" is whispered in the music long before any of the characters actually utter it, which makes it seem like the music is emanating from a kind of demon band who are foreshadowing the film's plot with their haunting music. In one scene where Sara is reacting to some unsettling sounds in the darkness, the sounds she's hearing blend into the sighs and thuds of the music, so that it's not clear if she's reacting to an actual noise in the room, or to the music that's creeping in from outside the diegesis.
He heard a scuffling behind him and looked around, nothing. He waited a moment longer before desperately trying to wiggle free in any direction. He lay down again about to push himself back when a voice said above him.
How did you inspire yourself to compose?
Cromak immediately scored a minor wound to Fangor's left leg.
In my marketing class, we were assigned groups and given a marketing plan project. The goal was to invent your own business and go over a marketing plan in front of the rest of the class for a grade.
I pulled away and drew her up from the couch. “That is unbelievably good,” I said, kissing her open mouth. “But I don’t want to come that way this time.”
Anyway, without further ado....
I just noticed my boobs look fricking awesome today. I keep sneaking a peek at myself.
That’s not a bad idea if the market’s against you and you don’t have to sell. 62 Mooreland was asking $4.194, couldn’t get it and rather than drop its price the owners yanked it. Why waste their time? Assessed value is $2.222 but the owners bought it for $3.525 in ’06, so you can undersatand their reluctance to drop much lower.
This is one I received to work on~ last night I started. And I can't show it. :-( Don't worry, next September I'll have loads of photo's for you! :-)
However, when the caveman-esque boys go to the bank to secure a loan so that they can open their own eatery, I began to wonder if they were gonna start bumping off swingers with a frying pan.
There’s a poetic patterning to the language that belies the surface realism. Joyce’s father is a ‘fire-and-brimstone preacher’, and her brother, who works in a steel mill, ‘holds a thing that burns orange fire’. These two details link back to the ‘heat’ that dries out Joyce’s hair, and to this sentence: ‘Music is the work of a devil that licks at her legs.’ Through the story, there’s a real sense of danger and terror, connected with the father’s fire and brimstone religion as well as Joyce’s harrowing experiences.
It was at Newnham that Mirrlees first met the anthropologist and “first woman intellectual” Jane Harrison, who was originally one of her tutors but who rapidly became the key influence in her development. Parmar is tactfully circumspect about addressing the nature of their relationship, although by revealing the private codes the couple used when talking about each other (eg. Elder and Younger Wife, both betrothed to a totemistic Bear-figure) she leaves us in little doubt that there was what Virginia Woolf called a “Sapphic” element to their long-standing co-habitation. But equally it was an intensely intellectual partnership, with the two women learning Russian, attending academic conferences and travelling throughout Europe together.
2. They can help to reduce oxidative stress, again cancer protective, but also a natural extender of your longevity . Oxidative stress is the overload of harmful molecules called free radicals, which are generated by the body and cause rapid aging, disease, wrinkles, illness….Reducing these free radicals may reduce the risk of getting sick, aging less than gracefully all the while reducing your risk for developing certain cancers.
BUT... I am wondering...
this is her explanation.
Hyatt filed a civil action under 35 U.S.C. §145 to the District Court for the District of Columbia, asking the court to reverse the BPAI's rejections. In support of the action, Hyatt filed a written declaration in which he identified portions of the specification that one of skill in the art would understand to describe the limitations challenged by the USPTO.
gifts for Christmas. I couldn't tell
First course was "Pasture and Knoll". It was Connecticut Pheasant Terrine and Rhode Island Rabbit Mousseline. It was served with spicy ale mustard, Concord grapes, and American Chestnut bread. I have to say that they were a notch above certain Charcuterie that I may have tasted in the past few weeks. No, I will not divulge any names but it may be someone that I know VERY well...
ROTE LEARNING MUST BE BANNED! Instead, children of all ages should be expected to express creativity and critical thinking by writing the answers to their tests in essay form, not merely marking “true” or “false” to a question or answering a multiple choice question in which it is possible to get the right answer by accident or by cheating! By causing children to take controversial positions and defend them before their peers, they may soon learn that many things they assumed were absolutely true from their parents and others are not necessarily so.
It is also hard to settle a lawsuit when you know you have done no wrong. The government’s charge is that Macmillan’s CEO colluded with other CEO’s in changing to the agency model. I am Macmillan’s CEO and I made the decision to move Macmillan to the agency model. After days of thought and worry, I made the decision on January 22nd, 2010 a little after 4:00 AM, on an exercise bike in my basement. It remains the loneliest decision I have ever made, and I see no reason to go back on it now.
If you know me at all you would know that generally I like easy- to -prep recipes. Being a busy mom of 3 and holding down a full-time career does not always support hours in the kitchen. But in addition to easy-to-prepare, I also look for recipes that call for top notch ingredients and have a flair about them. Madeleines have quite the flair. Make them into chocolate ones and boom - fireworks.
The shop is filled with beautiful hand stamped pieces, that include everything from necklaces to bracelets... and the customization possibilities are endless!
Anyway.In my current languored state.while , Chris was watching DR WHO, I idly skimmed through some of the many photos posted on the excellent facebook page called Old Photos Of Halifax,West Yorkshire
Dr Henderson would have to concede me that one.
But there is no way that you can forget about exercise! That is what it is all about, if you don’t get yourself into the fat burning threshold then you will not lose and significant weight, plus its about toning up the muscles too.
I have used Random.Org to select the winner and that person is No. 71, Sue's Craft Haven. Congratulations Sue. Please email (address in sidebar) and I will arrange for you to receive your prize.
* Rhys sitting down in a corner of the mall, grunting, telling me to "doh away!" (i.e. OBVIOUSLY pooping) . . . me thinking after a few minutes that he was done and herding him over towards the bathroom for a change . . . him running off back to his corner hollering at top volume "Nooo!!! Rhys more poop!!!!"
Thoughts? How would you answer the question?
Introduction: We celebrate Jesus going to heaven on Ascension Thursday (write it on the board). Ascension is the rising of Jesus Christ from earth to heaven after Resurrection. This day comes 40 days after Easter. On Ascension Thursday we pray, sing, and rejoice with Jesus and all the angels and saints. We call it a holy day and celebrate it be participating in Mass. The gospel reading for that day is about the Ascension of Jesus.
The remainder of the night went off without hitch. We enjoyed our food and each others company. I’m pretty sure I ate the whole carrot cake myself. Then we showered and went to bed…yada yada wink…forty five to sixty seconds later I was on my roof smoking a cigarette while she slept…or laughed at how quick I lasted LOL!. Another side effect of coming off of pills…need I say more about how bad drugs can fuck your whole shit up? LOL
The state-owned Dadu Hydropower Development Co., Ltd., which expanded to take on the dam-building, calls it ‘the enclosing of water resources. Its corporate website explains it tapped other companies (China Datang Cooperation, China Huadian Cooperation, Zhongxu Investment Co.) to “exploit several new sections” of cascade power stations. We hit new company boundaries every few hours, marked by gates of steel poles and flapping flags.
b) At home, when I'm not crafting, I permanently have my head buried in a book (or my Kindle!).
Gary Yeoh – JAC for Bukit Gasing.
I’m not sure whether female are more of visual creatures than guys, but it’s so easy to hear “oh this is pretty”, “it’s really cute” from a female. They are also enthusiastic shoppers and home decorators: sometimes satisfied by just looking around without buying anything. While guys more often do their shopping with a clear goal and looking more into functionality. It’s also women who tend to care more about whether they look good in photos and check their current “image” from mirrors, just like Cleo. Some study shows as early as four months old, baby girls can distinguish facial features and are able to distinguish between photos of people they know versus strangers. Baby boys are not able to do that. Even a brief look into the default categories Pinterest provides for people’s collection boards, seem to give us some hints: there are 32 categories in total, in a quick tag I did, there are 11 categories which are more “female” such as DIY & crafts, gardening, hair & beauty, while 7 are more “male”, such as cars & motorcycles, geek, science & nature. Female also “wins” on the Popular page of Pinterest, where you may see babies, panda sushis, women’s apparel and cute pancakes.
I've found that I have different masques... different persona's for different circumstances and situations.
Father, You do have a destiny for ___________ beyond the confines of this illness. You have a great purpose for his or her life. I thank You, Lord, that I can trust in those promises and believe that there will be breakthroughs in days ahead.
We have growth people! The seeds rolled around during watering and moving of the container, so my neat rows are no longer. However, I have several that have sprouted their first root. Yay!
If that’s okay I’ll strum along to the sound of your heartbeat anyways
1. Just upload a newly made project to your online blog or gallery. Then leave a direct link to your project in the link widget at the bottom of the challenge post. One entry per participant. To make your entry count more, follow the guideline below:
In the role of a music coach and music consultant, I really try to get artists to not only think about what they are posting, but think of all the other bands that are doing the same thing. By delivering a description with content, it can help optimize you and also give a sense of security for any one clicking through. Take those extra steps to get those extra clicks to get new fans and old fans to see what you want to share with them.
The Giveaway starts now and will run until Saturday, April 30th. The winner(s) will be announced on May 1st.
Betty White was also an early winner, picking up her second consecutive trophy for Best Female Actor in a Comedy Series for her work in “Hot in Cleveland.”
- Gloves
all i can think of is how i'd love to sit down and pick your brain. you were a product of the depression, and you prospered because of it, on very little money.
I could sleep while it froze.
So I decided my skill/niche would be knitting, and possibly making cloth. I have been hoarding yarn for about 15 years but that’s not all I’d knit. After the apocalypse, I would knit whatever I could and that’s the beauty of knitting. You can knit just about any damned thing. My friend Emalyn has a dress her mother knit out of cassette tape.
So where are you in all this Oscar talk? Are you a fan every year, no matter what? Or do you only care if Batman or Harry Potter, or Spielberg gets a nod?
Recently they released their first EP 24hours of Playgirl from Korean independent label Beatball Music and Playgirl is stealing boys' hearts with their delightful performance.
Then the left one will
What are the other long-term trends and impacts of this technology turn? What other implications does it pose to the current computer science and technology? This and other questions are addressed by six renowned researchers in this field. With this last department issue, we thank you for traveling with us through the trend wars in the past year.
In a million years nothing could have prepared the both of them for what they saw when they opened the door to the house with smoke coming out of its chimney. There was only one room, and in that room there was a lady, woman, and there was a rope, well she was hanging from the rafters by the rope. The boy knew she was dead, I don’t know if the child knew it. She saw food on the table, and went for it. She sat at that table, his little angel and gulped down that food with the dead woman dangling overhead. It is as if she did not see her. It is as if she did not care. The boy still stood at the door, wondering what life had become, wondering if the Irish god was punishing them for something. After she was done eating, his little angel made her way next to the dying fire and promptly fell asleep. She was home.
So I hit that asshole with my car.
Mary has grown up with such stories, of the vast water, the endless openness of the sea and sky. The freedom of such a place without fences, without the forest.
...Overall, NOAA experts said extreme weather events have grown more frequent in the United States since 1980. Part of that shift is due to climate change, said Tom Karl, director of the agency's National Climatic Data Center."
I told her if she wanted me to take her to Olathe to see him I would. It was up to her. I assured her that I could get her there and back before the photo shoot.
Seriously, ask me a question and I’ll give you a direct answer. You may not like my answer but for better or worse I will help you solve the problem and I’ll commit myself to your success.
That’s very bad news for Barack Hussein Obama and very good news for America.
accumulates. Dull cry of panic. May the
Freddie Deronde - double bass
Crabtree Brewing Braggot
If a soldier's funeral cortege passes you in the street, it means bad luck and you must spit on the ground and turn your back.
So many other things have suddenly decided to come for an extended stay with our family, that I am overwhelmed. SO. Everyone is doing fine... however, since chipping a bone off and herniating a disk in my back last February... somehow the TAXES never got filed! Just wanted everyone to know that all is well except for the entire family's filing skills. You do NOT want to know where I have been finding missing documents and receipts. If you have never heard of a Pulse (or Echo) pen by Livescribe... you should check it out. It is saving our collective hides and shortening my tax imposed stay glued to mountains of paperwork! (between organizing, putting lists together and recording (by voice) my very creative use of verbiage about all the places I have already searched... it also does something I never knew it could... I just have to write an equation on a piece of paper and it tells me the answer automatically... how cool is that?)
Isn't it lovely? My card also features the Serenity collection by BoBunny, and another of those awesome sentiment blocks by Graphic 45... hope you're not sick of seeing them yet :)
I thought about editing but knew the state my head was in it would probably be unproductive and this soon into the return to work…well I didn’t want to jinx it with a bad time. I didn’t feel like watching TV – even if I had thought something would be on worth watching. And my head space was running through the streets of all the worlds it had built and so I wasn’t in the mood for strolling through someone else’s world (even if it was Mr. King’s world).
Instead our introduction to it was the hardback book released under license by Games Workshop in 1987. Despite some initial reservations it was a hit, because I had bought the rules I was nominated GM ( a pattern that was to repeat itself more than once) and guided the other three novice players through character creation ending up with an Elf warrior, a civilized human priest and a human soldier. The initial adventure we ran through was "The Hill of Peace" published in White Dwarf where the fledgeling heroes were tasked with rescuing a merchants daughter from a religious cult led by a deranged Satyr.
STRESS!
This week we're linked up to kellythekitchenkop.com Kelly can tell you all about cooking with Real Food and how much healthier it is for you and yours than the McDonalds 'Happy Meal'.
See you on Cinco de Mayo!
Hey, it’s Friday!
- We've only done a couple of photography jobs so far this year
I couldn't stop laughing.
What Paul is doing is trying to establish that the Messiah will somehow take away our sins, the major tenet of Christianity. A closer look at the actual verse in Isaiah reveals quite a different picture: The Messiah’s role in Judaism has never been understood to take away our sins. We are taught, just the opposite, when we put aside our sins then the Messiah will come! It is significant that many Christian translations of Isaiah have this translated correctly, while Paul in Romans insists on advancing his agenda.
In Vietnam, RAND invented the theories that led two administrations to military escalation against North Vietnam — and even after the think tank’s strategy had obviously failed and the secretary of defense had disowned it, RAND never publicly acknowledged that it had been wrong. Abella comments, “RAND found itself bound by the power of the purse wielded by its patron, whether it be the Air Force or the Office of the Secretary of Defense.” And it has always relied on classifying its research to protect itself, even when no military secrets were involved.
Skunky and Pay Pay. I was so thankful and happy that one of my bestest friends-Heather and her two darling kids could come stay with us for a few days. We had a blast and Scarlett and Payton played so well together. I sure do wish they lived closer.
6. Ok, let's set up a regular schedule for you to keep me informed on what you're doing for me. And fax a copy of the offer to my lawyer and accountant. They'll be in touch with changes.
However, News International employees Bob Bird and Douglas Wight, as well as NotW solicitor Kenneth Lang, were indeed Crown witnesses. All three were questioned in court about phone hacking.
Me and big mouth, forgetting I have a stone-cold rockhound sitting behind me.
Also in DWM 403...
Racism needs to be confronted, flat-out -- but not drawn out.''
Lungs fill with air
Serves 6 – 8 people ~ one pear each.
We had a goodbye dinner with Newcastle Guy and Quebec Hottie before Alex left for Seattle. It was a goodbye dinner but also a celebratory dinner because those two crazy kids recently ran off and got married. I wanted to post a picture of them on the blog but they wished to remain anonymous so we compromised --
removed her parental rights when I was 17. I was terrified in that
Christopher wanted to repair/replace my broken means of communication and virtually all things social right away, but I waved my hand in front of his face and said "no no dear, don't rush". A break would be nice? Actually, a break would be reeeeal nice. A guilt free break. And it was. Nice.
1. The Notebook
SPRINGFIELD MO
Have I forgotten anything? If it's chiles, there was that Turkish sausage Mustafa fed me, with rings of raw chile on a piece of hot ekmek, eaten standing in the kitchen at Anatoli, that blew my head off and had me begging for more. But it was the last sausage.
About that time the family dog came and cold-nosed him on the behind. He thought the snake had bitten him, so he screamed and fell over on the floor. His wife thought he had a heart attack, so she covered him up, told him to lie still and called an ambulance.
youuuuu got tooo
However, what will come down between who ultimately takes the series and moves on to Round 3 will be all on the two elite goaltenders, Nashville’s Pekka Rinne and Phoenix’s Mike Smith.
If you can fill the empty void of this Isle
Mick has fallen in love with music and in spite of never really having had any kind of musical training, begins to compose in notebooks that she keeps hidden in a hat box under her bed. When she thinks of her attraction to music, she thinks of it as being in her inside room--the place where only she may venture and the place where she stores her insights into life, and the place where she is who she was meant to be. Quite simply, a place separate from ego. Because of her family's extreme poverty she has to begin working while still in high school and with the overtime hours she finds all her energy invested in the work of a sales girl, to the point that when she gets home the music no longer comes to her.
Breivik himself placed his innocent mother in this position.
Just what are the lessons that our schools are teaching to our children?
His closest disciples did not understand this either. This is why Peter came to his defense in the garden of Gethsemane and cut off the ear of the Roman soldier who was trying to apprehend Jesus. Peter wanted to defend the ”man” He thought Jesus was, not who Jesus actually was. Peter, and so many others then and now, could not see who Jesus was outside the “man” he thought him to be. He only saw the “man” and thought the “man” was endowed with special powers and that he must defend Jesus, as “the man” Peter “thought” him to be.
However, I mentioned it to my husband those many months ago and he was really less than enthusiastic about it. So, the compromising lady that I am, decided that I could make do without the lovely architectural addition and just get away with painting one wall blue. The husband was on board with that idea, so I ran with it, and you can read about the results of that in THIS POST
Now let’s consider another detail from Joshua 10. The language used regarding the sun and moon no longer following their normal course of action.
Determine my flow
The bobble blanket, which grows about a millimetre a week, is now my Travelling Crochet Project. You only need one ball of wool, so perfect for bunging in a carrier bag into a handbag. I told Teenage Daughter #1 yesterday as I was doing a row in the car (long story...) and she told me I was mental. Not as mental as helping myself to two grey wooden boxes with heart cut outs and a metal bulb thingy with a handle from the left out rubbish outside a shop opposite where she is temping yesterday. (I may claim that last sentence as the worst example of written English on a blog, ever.) I did ask the shopkeeper first and then furtively rushed them back to my car before said daughter looked up from her typewriter and saw me through the window while she was trying to be all secretaryish.
I am so glad to have the time to write another post again, something I've been wanting to do around 9:30 every night as my eyes get heavy and my pillow is calling me. Despite all the work and pressure I put on myself, I am thankful and would not trade it for anything :)
As your last resort to your dilemma...DON'T go to the function at all. Another simple and easy solution.
Why not to watch: Because it hurts.
Jim Morrison was a rebel poet subjected to severe censor and punishment for behavior that today is more or less expected of rock stars. Yet, in March of 1969, Morrison was arrested on stage for "indecent exposure" and sentenced to eight months of hard labor. The real crime for which Morrison was found guilty; was expression of music and lyrics both iconoclastic and anarchist in a refusal to accept social repression and restraint.
38. Mouth cut trousers nah ah fit Massa. What you boast about yourself may not necessarily be true.
And I know that in the past year I have met MANY non-transgender lesbian, gay and bisexual queer folks who stand with their transgender friends and the transgender community. I think of Brian in New York and Jane in Washington State and Sharon in London and Suzy in Maryland and Christine in Colorado and Doug in Oregon and Doris in Vancouver and Tim in Tennessee and many many more.
Our traveling was not over yet. We still had about 2,5 hours to go by bus to our final destination, Verona. I was still so sleepy and tired at that point we only chatted with Lisa for a moment until I fell asleep.
You are 35 weeks on Saturday. Maybe, just maybe, I will be allowed to try and feed you. Last night, you tried to eat your hand as it brushed past your mouth. I was thrilled!
Julia Mayfield as a wish to her dieing sister is taking her nephew to see the grandparents that he never knew. Dealing with 2 year olds isn't something Julia is good with after spending some time in World War II. Figuring she can do this wish for her sister, then move on with her life and write the book she eagerly awaits to write about her war adventures. The grandparents are too distraught over the death of their son that they will not even acknowledge that their grandson is who Julia says he is. She just wants to get out of this backwoods hollar and get back to society, when her parents throw a wrench in her return plans, causing Julia to stay through Christmas. Love of family and friends grows on Julia in KY, will she ever be able to leave this hollar again?
But me? I haven't regretted saying no for a single second. I made the right decision.
I find it so hard to make male cards that are not for children! I think a lot of crafters have this problem. A friend of mine let me borrow this Stampin' Up set and I wanted to make a birthday card with the large buck but make it very bland.
Further, since there are so many ways in which we exploit and inflict cruelty on sentient nonhumans, and since industry is so resilient to the temporary and superficial changes brought about by the so-called “victories”, the opportunities for the welfare-campaign-donation business cycle can easily last indefinitely, or for as long as industry itself lasts.
BYOBPM - Bring your own blood pressure monitor.
Also, I've got some buttons over on the right column for some awards for which I've been nominated. If you're so inclined, you can vote for my blog in any/all of the categories.
Muscle and blood and skin and bones
But the rewards of taking things into my own hands are wonderful; it means I can bring my very own crunchy fried snack ideas into fruition. Take today's post subject as an example. I can't get these vegan and gluten-free jalapeno rosemary potato fritters at my local takeaway, but I can sure make them at home. And ain't that grand?
300g unsalted butter, cubed, at room temperature
neighborhood block parties
6. Y.T.T. (5:57)
Doris Day, Rock Hudson, Tony Randall. A delightful trio who made several more movies together.
More bumbling random ramblings from Mondo and me, plus an array of top toons to enjoy. The 'theme' for this show is 'Summer', enabling us to bring you ten sunny delights... sort of!
"not fans of SIBA…especially the Scottish branch. In fact we pretty much detest everything they stand for and their close-minded clique mentality"*BD also go on to make clear that they've joined mainly to get access to the Direct Delivery Scheme - which allows SIBA members to sell to some pubco outlets while preserving the pubco mark-up (and subject to pubco control).
Mandy Fontain
more and more often i feel i'm not being true to myself in posting pretty pictures that are falling far behind what i'm really after. i've been debating this for a long time. i wondered whether i'm being precious. or deluding myself in thinking that i'm even able to do anything else than pretty pictures.
Does Meyer really have the right to control what former players say, especially those in the media who have a job to do? He seems to think so…
I use to belong to the Unity Stamp Club way back when and I have these HUGE sentiments stamps, that I love and I just can't seem to part with!! I wish they would start making more of these....... I love the size and it really makes a statement, right!? :)
Like the NACTs abolition of the democratically elected Canterbury Regional Council to allow the thousands of dairy farmers to squat on scarce water rights, the new Auckland Supercity will open the way to grab its public resources and distribute them to the parasitic cabinet ministers and their mates in big business and property development.
~ Jesu, Joy of Man's Desiring by Bach
Locked in the cult of domesticity,
The download comes direct from a digitization of a tape which GT editor Brian Pattison recorded of the show, and has had filed away all these years - heard by NOBODY until now!
I invoked the secret names
Health and Safety hadn't been invented back then. In the playground we played Hot Rice (throwing a ball very hard to try and hit kids' legs) and we often went out on Nature Walks without even taking a permission letter home... but we learned to read and write and I can still chant my times tables so they must have got something right.
For this card, I used the Cottage Cutz Shower Peepers 4x6 die, along with the My Little Shoebox Ornate Circle Frame 4x6 die. I added some pearls to the flowers, and pretty satin and organza ribbon for embellishment. I found this sentiment in a set of stamps I had from Peachy Keen Stamps called Spring Bouquet. I cut this chickie out with white card stock and I colored it with Copic markers. Before I colored, I stamped the face with Memento Tuxedo black ink, which is great for use with Copics because I never have to worry about it smudging. The patterned paper is some I had in my stash from Stampin Up!, and I did pop this cutie up onto an action wobble, so she's got a little bit of wiggle going on. What a happy card!!!
I've broke my tutorial down so I'm showing you skin today & then I decided to show you how I do a dress showing creases. However I chose the wrong stamp really so I cheated & rather than starting again with another image I just adapted this one for you cus I can still use it for a tag.....you will see what I mean lol.
I don't care what anyone says, she's just the wrong shape to have nipples.
Matt Striker is in the locker room, with The Viper, Randy Orton.
SAY GOODBYE TO WINTER
‘it helps me walk.’
It's also good to be around some old friends. Last Saturday, our neighbors Dave and Floreen Clark, had a mystery welcome home dinner at their house. This is a role playing who-done-it murder mystery that includes dinner, mayhem, and wine...of course. Bill and Jackie Woods, and Shane and Duane Yokum rounded out the group.
Acting, as people believe, isn’t as easy a job, especially when you have to keep your personal life disconnected from the professional one. Things become worse when ex-lovers from real life have to play passionate lovers on-screen.
How about a movie that pitted Dracula against Frankenstein's monster? With some random bikers? And hippies? And a dwarf? And a blonde?
Publisher: Speak (Penguin)
7. Look Up In The Sky 03:40
Note: I only ship within the US/Canada.
Interest on overdue payments
I love your beautiful long hair,
1 diligently
Johnson's above comments appear in the middle of a speech in which he explains why it is impossible for an establishment of religion to be made by the government under the new Constitution. The fact is that one of the main Federalist arguments in favor of the U.S. Constitution, which had no bill of rights, was that the people could prevent tyranny because they not only possessed and knew how to use arms but they also understood their rights.
5. Santa Claus is Comin' to Town
And as per Hart’s link to his wife Sherrine and Sunway Construction…..look how much government minister have family who own companies that getting government contract….on the basis of its prevalence under this regime it not illegal at all….Hart simply practising Good Family Values KPB style!
Memorable Line: “Coffee’s free for friends of the press.”
This time, God wasn’t in the grapes.
“You know what I mean,” he said affectionately.
hildbirth includes birth doula certificates through Hope House, Inc. and tr=
So you’re Meeko aren’t you, dog? The dog’s tail wags at the sound of its name. Feeling awkward, I tell the dog I’m sorry about its owner. This is a strange situation for several reasons. One; I’m talking to a dog as if he understands what I’m saying. Two; The fact that I’m talking to a dog at all. And three; I don’t even like dogs, or animals for that matter. I decide I should get going again. Before I leave, I look around the room for anything that might be useful in my travels. I go to grab a lantern, but keep my eyes on Meeko, expecting it to object to me taking something that belongs to its dead master. It just continues to look at me somewhat forlornly. The lantern in my hand, I nod politely to the dog, and exit the shack.
In my house we have a love for mexican/tex-mex foods and we love Chipotle. This tastes just like the real thing. I'm serving it tonight with pineapple and green chile pork tacos.
This past weekend we took the cupcake trailer out to Texas Ranch Life for the Washington On The Brazos Event, "The Sundown Social." This was WOB first annual fund-raising event and we had a great time working along side some amazing food vendors. Veritas Bistro from College Station was there with their award-winning food truck. Chef Tai prepared some amazing dishes that we were lucky enough to snag a few samples of. Check out his website and rent his food truck for your next party!
Sad thing is my very, very gray haired hubby is pissed that I am the age I really am (which I won't admit to) I don't have a single gray hair. He was sure if I quit coloring my hair 4 years ago he would see some gray. Ummmm nope. Sorry love. Hehehehehehe Still last night he was looking. Not one, which just proves what my daddy always said, I have no wisdom.
Can you do the painting thing I mentioned?
4. The chemical, laboratory and electronic audit reports are flawed and inconclusive
Black pepper, to taste
Nesi's starting to cough too. I think it's just
Display screen dimension in addition to screen resolution tend to be yet another a couple of special features regarding androids. The screens regarding android gadgets tend to be based on feel along with high quality alarm is definitely applied in it. Therefore, you might delight in some best expertise involving contact. You’ll be able to alter picture, keying, taking part in game titles together with the finger touch on your android.
I looked into his eyes. Deep, brown loving eyes. His lips were bitten red in colour and his skin the colour of coffee. He was perfect. He always had been, but here in this form he had no human flaws. All his physical illnesses had fallen away. He had his curls back. A full head of glorious, black , glossy curls that framed his delicate face. His skin had a wonderful and delicious dark tone. Chest hairs poked out from under his white shirt and he looked the perfect weight for his frame.
My favorite triathlete, Chris McCormack aka Macca(for those of you not familiar w/ triathlon, he's a 2x Ironman World Champion), gave me the best advice possible(he has a facebook page, and always takes time to reply to his fans, which I think is awesome)
Not quite the same! The colors did not blend into the white buttercream as it should have. So, what have I learned?
Wore my new shoes to the Johan Creten exhibit Friday evening, had coffee with friends Saturday lunchtime at a lively streetside cafe. I love the cafe life here in Paris. It inspires one to paint. The last picture was painted by my busy little hands. Wishing everyone a sparkling week. Follow our blog via Bloglovin HERE
NO ONE WANTS TO BE THIS TEACHER’S PET . . .
'Well we don't know what to do. Let us pray together for guidance.'
Several things have been called to my attention of late. One of them is that I am not a very honest person. I don’t tend to lie outright (and just so you know, I just did); rather, I distort the truth, conceal it partially in smoke and deflect any penetrating light with mirrors, or worst of all, I simply ignore it or deny its existence.
Secretary Clinton refuted allegations that Gross was an intelligence agent, but did not directly reject a prisoner swap.
I am so behind getting this completed this week. It's been a truly crazy, stressful couple of days. I'm just waiting for it all to end!! I haven't even felt like stamping, thats when I know it's bad!! haha Today I am going to take my father out for dinner, he helped save one of my days. We had a leaky shower head, which turned into a huge fiasco...needless to say the wall had to be torn out and things had to be fixed and replaced. Thank goodness for Dads who happen to know how to do these types of things!!! Very lucky!
UPCOMING CERTIFICATION CLASSES:
Hi there! This is Rose sharing two cards that I've made using beautiful Sara Burrier digital images available at the Crafts and Me Stamps online store.
I am stamping a bit more than normal right now.
(From 5H) The band is introduced as "The band had played other places in California, and is now playing here, and has former Mother Love Bone members, and is now called Mookie Blaylock." Ed talks about playing the Florentine Gardens: "Last night we played the Florentines, which is a cool place! The security people are really nice over there." "No shit, Eddie!" some guy in the crowd shouts. A very cool, short concert with lots of crowd interaction with the power and vibe of the band bursting out.
Saying the “Eternal Father” (6) on the “Our Father” bead and then 10 “For the sake of His sorrowful Passion” (7) on the following “Hail Mary” beads.
Saturday, 28th April 2012…. Around 3 plus in the afternoon hubby called and said he’s on the way back, he asked whether I want to visit the graveyard… Without doubt my answer was YES!
“Ohh, oooh.” Tears started to fill my eyes.
The "Must-Do" at the top for our class is to read for 15 minutes from their buddy books.
The Mississippi Gulf Coast is one of the South's most popular seashore resort areas. It stretches twenty-six miles, from Biloxi to Henderson Point, averaging two hundred feet in width, making it the longest and largest man-made beach in the world. Natch, all that water means lots of fresh seafood, too. And if you get tired of the sand, sun, and seafood, there's plenty of Las Vega style casinos there that are only too happy to separate you from your dirty ol' money.
lagniappe
Artwork By - Hans-Joachim Roedelius , LabelArt , Rosa Roedelius
Where’s the beef?
Now, THIS package was a complete surprise! Randi, the winner of the "How tall am I?" giveaway sent me a package with of sorts of goodies.
The other occupations associated with the cane field such as the field nurse, firemen, and watchers were done by both genders, but not in equal proportions.
My suggestion is simply that petitioners must, before the trial court, show a more specific legal right — a right cast in language of a significantly lower order of generality than Article II (15) of the Constitution — that is or may be violated by the actions, or failures to act, imputed to the public respondent by petitioners so that the trial court can validly render judgment granting all or part of the relief prayed for. To my mind, the Court should be understood as simply saying that such a more specific legal right or rights may well exist in our corpus of law, considering the general policy principles found in the Constitution and the existence of the Philippine Environment Code, and that the trial court should have given petitioners an effective opportunity so to demonstrate, instead of aborting the proceedings on a motion to dismiss.
souvenirs. Tonight he wore skinny jeans showing his boxers and a rainbow Muppets
1) If you're going to take a firearms class, unless it is a basic introduction to gun handling, make sure you have zeroed your weapon and have enough rounds through it to ensure that it functions reliably. 100 or 200 rounds does NOT constitute a functions test/torture test. In a recent class, we had a gentleman who was running a M4 variant out of a major name's custom shop...well, trying to run it anyway. Every single round was a light firing pin strike. It didn't take too long (although longer than it should have) to figure out, the hammer spring was in backwards, not creating enough tension to drive the firing pin forward at sufficient velocity to ensure detonation of the primer. The owner did acknowledge that he hadn't even zeroed the rifle prior to the class.
It's such a cute set and has a die to cut out the whale. I think it is adorable for a child but could easily be sent to an adult also.
Shatung: Humans don’t seem to understand the delicate balance of earth’s creatures. Each species carries a specific energy that contributes to the whole. If my species or others are lost, there is a tear in the energetic fabric that weakens the overall stamina of the earth affecting all. There is perfection in our world.
I know I have! lol
Prepare pastry
Here’s a list of things I have always wanted to do for spring break, which have never quite happened:
4. Clouds tinted pink by the setting sun, a feeling of well being.
And tyranny reigns for Liberty has fled.
Last week was a whirlwind of activity....client meetings and projects, birthday celebrations (Tim is yet another year older!) , the new month's magazine perusals to name a few.
Today I welcome Karen Fisman, the author of Adventures in Latkaland and Problems in Purimville, the second book in the Jacob and Sarah series.
A tossed salad and butternut squash baked in peach tea & maple syrup, carrot cake with cream cheese frosting for dessert.
PRINT MEDIA
Red Snapper with Mango Shrimp Salsa
to see him at the same time, and after fighting with eachother
Run the pie under the broiler until the meringue is golden and the tips are dark brown (Or, if you’ve got a blowtorch, use it to brown the meringue.) Remove the pie from the oven and let it cool for about 15 minutes, then refrigerate for at least 3 hours before serving.
Billy Harper: tenor sax
7) Know the difference between a rut and a block. Writer’s block is when you’ve shut down and your tank is empty. In that case, you just need to do something – anything – to change the patterns in your brain (walk away, sing, get outdoors, do some yoga, cuddle with your pet…you get the idea). A rut is more like a false start. This happens when you’re using a bad idea, it’s bad timing, or you’re sticking with old methods that don’t work. Get out of a rut by questioning everything except your ability to get out of it.
The first pipe (A) is found at the intersection of Hammersmith Terrace / Chiswick Mall /Eyot Gardens.
The best corporate participants do things that enhance the Second Life experience. The night before the flood was due to go live details and relevant SLURLs (Second Life URLs) of the places where Adventure Ecology Avatars would be were sent to the various contacts we had made in world. This ensured we had several hundred Residents participating in the event.
With lead singer Adam Olenius singing about leaving and searching for something real, it’s fitting that the music video takes place on an ocean-faring freighter. With nods to the ships port of call and life on the open seas, the video feels cold and welcoming at the same time. Kind of how I imagine life in Scandinavia to be.
What if AY opponent Bill Batson, a neophyte at campaigning, had faced only AY booster Freddie Hamilton rather than Hakeem Jeffries, a polished candidate with an elusive position on AY? What if Batson had won--would it have had an impact on Silver?
then our numbers result in a total of 4.3% of diocesan priests with
I have my friend Alex Keto to thank for introducing Tintin to my family. Like so many of you Alex mailed my boys books after our house burned and the books he sent were some of the many Adventures of Tintin.
Phone: +1.650.243.2700
Johnny Alpha and a whole bunch of bad-ass mutants staring out from the cover of Prog 349.
What I enjoyed about the two I've read is the playing with genres. Although they are historical mysteries set in Russia, The Winter Queen is like a James Bond novel and Murder on the Leviathan a Golden Age mystery with an enclosed setting, in this case a the world's largest steamship — but think Death on the Nile by Agatha Christie and you won't be far wrong. The third, which I'll hopefully get around to reading soon, seems to have elements of George Macdonald Fraser. They're well worth seeking out.
and ate of it.
So you may find yourself feelings symptoms this month. You may need extra rest. You for sure will need to let go of whatever arises. The spiritual experiences you have, it sounds like, will not last but they will nonetheless have a profound impact on you. The fact that they do not last doesn’t mean that something’s amiss. You and I are here to serve and need to remain able to serve. If they lasted we probably would forget about serving. So these experiences will help us but once we’ve had them they may subside.
honestly my phone's blowing up tonight
Today for example. I was on what I can only call an Angst Walk. This is when, as lately, things get to be a Bit Too Much and so I grab my iPod and go for a walk, playing very loud very angry music, sometimes wandering into the woods where I can cry and rage and sniffle whilst Trent screams dire things in my ears. Catharsis, Karla Style. I am an angry girl lately. Watch me rage.
“Except Alaska.”
The other department, your “hidden factory”, works the same hours as your regular team, but their efforts are burned up in rework, repeat calls from the same customer on the same issue, rejected documents and refused quality. These team members work in the dark underside of your customer service department.
The booties are seamless, which I absolutely loved! I embroidered some little pink daisies on them because they just seemed so plain to me....and I think this little deserves some May flowers, since she shall be a May baby. The socks are a fast little knit that I've used a few times before.
Title : A Diagnostic System for Studying Energy Partitioning and Assessing the Response of the Ionosphere During HAARP Modification Experiments.
that we have in place a policy which forces young men and women to lie
Caramel syrup as per need
I guess he doesn’t think everything is exactly the way it should be right now because now he is depressed. I don’t know what to do. He often wants to quit because he feels he can never get ahead. He has no idea that he makes me feel the exact same way.
Must be added with vanilla in another mixing bowl.
In this age of evites and emails, invitations seem almost redundant, but I love the idea of having made an invitation for my daughter each year, collecting them up just for her. My goal, eventually, is to frame them up all together, year by year, for her to keep for always.
As I walked up the sloping lawn, my father came to mind and I was momentarily filled with a sadness over the fact that he is no longer in this world. This man who loved the world and yet struggled at times to find peace within it, who saw eighty-four springs (it seems like such a paltry number now), is not here to see this spring. And now, I can't seem to shake a Raymond Carver poem I read a few days ago. It speaks to why I returned to this place of my childhood. I thought you might like it, too.
Mmmmm ... it was sooo awesome! Paired it with some Chicken Rice-a-Roni ... didn't even bother with veggies ... but oh well ... my tummy is so happy now! I'll do salad tomorrow!
Anastasia’s brow gel sets your perfect brow look with a hint of tint and is fortified with botanical hair conditioners and essential oils to keep brows feeling as great as they look.
Do you know me? I used to be so cheerful, the proud owner of an easy smile. I was optimistic and upbeat; pointing out the silver lining behind each of the dark and looming clouds. I was walking across the bridge into motherhood, and felt full of dreams for this baby that was growing inside me, our baby, my baby.
Not to constantly emphasize a really obvious point, but being poor SUCKS! Today I was so low on funds that I couldn't afford a U-Bahn ticket and spent my entire ride to and from work staring at the train doors, ready to jump off if anyone looked remotely like a ticket inspector. (Here in 'Schland-land they use the honor system to get you to buy tickets, but do random checks every so often, and if caught you face a massive fine.) Luckily, I made it to work without getting caught, but when I complained to my boss about how my late paycheck had brought me to petty crime, she totally didn't sympathize.
The answer becomes obvious if we posit (as I have done at length elsewhere) that Leftists really have no concern at all about what they are advocating, that they do not really care about human advancement at all, that their "concern" for the poor etc. is a sham. What they really want they want now -- and that is power, simple causes that will win them praise and drama in which they can star as the good guys. That really is about all. And neo-liberalism meets none of those needs. The policies advocated by Neo-liberals do demonstrably lead to slow but steady human economic advancement and do increase prosperity for all to levels once undreamt of in human history. But such policies also diffuse power, are far from simple and are very undramatic. It is hard work just to understand neo-liberalism and there are no immediate rewards inbuilt. One could, for instance, TRY going onto the streets and demonstrating in favour of "comparative advantage" (one of the essential ideas underpinning advocacy of free trade) but that would almost certainly lead to total incomprehension rather than win kudos. And Che Guevara is someone that anybody and everybody can understand -- which is a lot more than can be said for Eugen von Boehm-Bawerk.
I made some fantastic friends over the last 8 years on these sites, quite a few I have met, some I am going to meet very soon... so, yes, I am happy!
OK, so I think you're getting the picture now. I don't like hot weather. I'm not ashamed to admit it. Not that things were always that way. Not liking sunshine/summer/hot weather is vaguely embarrassing. It's like saying you don't like babies, or kittens, or other things everyone is supposed to like. It's no wonder then, that for a long time I felt compelled to lie about it. So, when someone said to me, during the hottest and most uncomfortable day of the year, 'Beautiful isn't it?', I'd probably nod, or mutter some words of agreement. I probably wouldn't say, 'No. I feel like I've just descended into the seventh circle of Hell,' even though I probably felt it.
However, Santa found it necessary to start talking to me. “HEY!” he roared in a guttural voice. “I was hoping you could help me out with this!”
Do you have a one-sentence summary of your story?
Is bravely pushing upward through the melting snow
BLITZER: All right. All right.
I couldn't even finish a game of Scrabble with my youngest son.
9 " round cake pan
A cynical analyst might even suspect that Saudi Arabia likes being able to help out al-Shabaab by buying its charcoal.
with him his bag of medicines and along the way might gather roots, bark, or leaves from plants and mix them into potions. He began his examination with prayer, and before administering a skin sore, for example, he would first nick himself and apply it to himself, and then to the patient. If it were something liquid, he would first drink it, then give it to the patient, and then conclude with a respectful prayer. All of this showed how we needed to gather as much information as we could about these traditional practices and not simply to dismiss them as “superstitions.” In fact, Mr. Cisse explained that progress has been made in that direction and that in modern Guinean hospitals today, there are Western trained doctors working alongside traditional African healers. This exemplifies the type of cross cultural exchange that is so necessary for us to understand one another’s history, and I was glad to hear of it.
Is it fair to say you understand
Summer is here, a new crop of young people have graduated from College and are ready to begin their intrepid journey into the real world. The HDC is there to cushion the fall from student to adult, providing it's loving fans with quality collaborative art. We hope to inspire and connect creative artists to spawn a cloud-like network of collaborative individuals. (4 words over 8 letters and the word "cloud" used in that last sentence : brownie points for the blog mistress!)
Last night I watched an episode of The Daily Show with Jon Stewart that did a take on the recent House of Representatives committee hearing about birth control. The committee consisted of eight men and all the witnesses were men, none of whom had uteruses or a vested interest in birth control. On The Daily Show, one man interviewed another man about women’s issues while five women wanted to speak. The women included the head of the National Organization of Women (NOW), the head of Emily’s List, which gets women elected to government offices, and three other such knowledgeable and influential women. It made vivid the idiocy of men talking about women’s needs instead of women talking about women needs.
11 Little Bit of Sympathy
- Playing with and knowing our creative expression helps us know our health expression. It has a unique pattern, flow, as does our creative expression.
H. P. Lovecraft – The Reanimator
And blessed is she that believed: for there shall be a performance of those things which were told her from the Lord.
Count back by sevens beginning with the last number
But these and other issues related to hydraulic systems is already well understood by the teams with similar hydraulics being used both for the braking system and the high pressure electro-hydraulic control systems.
I guess after I find out that it’s not ectopic I have to let myself calm down and enjoy the ride. No more daily emails to my OB and no information requests from Dr. Google. I need to just get a book I trust and stick with that, because internet searches can reveal scary stuff, and I don’t want to surround myself with any unnecessary anxiety.
Well, that was a fun episode. “Puppy Love” was definitely a nice way of giving both Tom and Hal different types of love interests with similar (ish) possibilities for danger but more importantly, it finally seems like the storylines surrounding Eve and the Old Ones are finally going to get underway. Next week’s episode looks reasonably chaotic.
Early on in the manuscript, I write at least 1000 quality words a day. Usually that amounts to about four hours of work, although it can take as long as six hours, and on rarer occasions, two hours. Once the story starts coming into its own, I try to write 2000 words a day.
Where: Armory Center for the Arts in Pasadena
i'm sooooo in love with my little flea flea
The wine a 2009 Fontanafredda Moscatod'Asti a sweet Italian dessert wine
As you can tell, I am truly proud of my daughter!
When we had our own children we also
Tanith Lee's latest collection, published by NewCon Press, is part of their new Imaginings line. This line will consist of short story collections by selected authors and contain previously published, but uncollected, stories and some original stories picked by the authors themselves. You can find more information on this venture on the NewCon Press website.
Hi everyone! Just want to give you a little advance notice about a cool blog hop I'm in this weekend. As a designer for the Card A Day Blog, I am participating in a hop celebrating World CardMaking Day which happens this year on October 1st. The hop includes 13 designers, and will run the whole weekend through midnight ET on Sunday night so you'll have plenty of time to check out all their blogs. There are lots of prizes involved both from the main blog as well as some of the designers' personal blogs. And we are having a challenge! You'll have to visit and play along to win!!
Fifteen miles from Matamoras is Saylorsburg, a sleepy rural Pocono community, where powerful Turkish pasha Fethullah Gulen has established a 45 acre mountain fortress. The fortress remains protected by 100 Turkish guards and a sentry post. Local residents have complained of automatic gunfire coming from the complex and of a low flying helicopter that surveys the area for would-be intruders.
I head to the bank to check that I’m not overdrawn, not dipped into my overdraft, then buy some over-the-counter medicine before this cold overpowers me. I think I’ve been overcharged.
Shirt Color (used Patons Astra School Bus Yellow)
Me, I consider myself a feminist in Christina Hoff Sommers vein. I can’t imagine what it would be like to leave my child in daycare and head to work. I know my professional life will take a beating, and that’s just the price to pay for having this amazing stage in my life. I don’t ask anyone to lobby for longer maternity leaves on my behalf, and while I will want an understanding employer in the future, I don’t expect to be compensated as generously as single women or fathers. Above all, I want to raise my son to be a gentleman, and my daughter — a lady.
-Karmen
Our first stop in packaging was the break room where our musically inclined group instantly grabbed the guitar off of the wall. Slinky Cobblestone warmed us up and then Dave Mulligan performed his Sierra Nevada jingle while Slinky slinked. We ran off one employee on his break and another put up with us but did not seem to enjoy the racket. We then saw the impressive Krones bottling line and I learned (and forgot) how to decipher the bottling code. We continued on to another hop storeroom, past the kegging line, and small batch bottling line. The afternoon seemed to wrap up quickly and we found ourselves back in the pub for more beers and music.
Written on the backs of the photos from top to bottom, "Smythe Canal," "Smythe Canal," "Straights of Magellan," Gletseher Bar, Straights of Magellan, Crossing the Bar," Magellan Straights," and "German Sailing Ship." Note, a strait is a narrow channel between two pieces of land. Straight is, well a straight line. The photos may have been taken by a seaman, but one who didn't know the difference between the two words.
I think I’m beginning to discover my mission as a portrait photographer is to help people stop being scared of their own faces.
In term of brushes, a pointed round brush is perfect to add fine details once the initial washes of colour are dry. You can also use the tip of the brush handle to drag the colour and draw some grass blades. An old and distressed flat brush with uneven hair is a good tool to suggest the texture of grass in the middle ground.
Wednesday, I went to my first yoga class in Chinese!!!
ELDERFLOWER MARTINI (makes two cocktails)
Nechtan’s childhood included education at court by monks from the highest monasteries of the day. He was fluent in all northern British dialects and learned Gaelic on visits to Iona, which he maintained through contact with a Columban familia of monks who attended his brother Bridei’s court. An enclave persisted from the time Anglian Abercorn mission returned south of what became the permanent border. In spite of Abercorn’s closure, good relations were maintained with the Anglian church through contact with Northumbrian Jarrow. This was a clever device allowing the Pictish court to be fully informed on church doctrine via both outlets: Iona created a ‘celtic’ connection with the Irish church; Northumberland provided a direct line to Rome.
Favorite Quote: “Their doctor said, ‘I’ve never seen so puzzling a condition. But lamps are not my specialty – you need an electrician.’”
"I went to Saint Mary's and I graduated in '62, too!"
(iii) A regiment of 4,000 soldiers, under the command of Major-General John Sullivan Wood marched from Gorakhpur to invade Palpa.
I'm tired of the lie that is Europe, and the concealment of the true aim of a federal Europe with the destruction of the sense of nationhood. It's so undemocratic that it's almost hard to believe they're getting away with it.
members of Searchlight staff habitually use the generic term ‘Searchlight’ when communicating with members of the public,
He always moans to me that it’s hard to get people in – moan moan moan these bloody Colonials – but, when I went last Wednesday night, it was a full house – it always is when I wander along – and Lewis was on unusually good form. Normally, he plays a blindingly good first half then loses confidence and tries to persuade the audience they’re not enjoying themselves as much as they think they are. Or he starts the show by saying he’s shit tonight but, by at least halfway through, he’s storming it. Last week, he stormed it for about 95% of the time though, of course, afterwards he was complaining to me that he hadn’t done very well.
1901--Phoenix
Lost faces say we adore you
The IP Finance Institute is the unit of the Italian University Politecnico di Torino which focuses on the economics and financial aspects of intellectual property. As a non-profit organization, the IP Finance Institute promotes and develops know-how transfer, research initiatives and projects relating to IP as an economic asset and its use in IP-based financing solutions.
Question: What do you think about the yellow tone in the edited photo?
I have always written in a variety of different spaces depending on my mood and the book I’m writing. The first picture is the view from my son’s window where I wrote The Long Weekend one autumn a few years ago.
Dick said he has not closed the door to further discussions and that Superintendent of Schools Thomas Brennan has indicated he, too, would like to keep talking. Dick also understands that residents might be asking why the teachers turned down this deal if it could have saved some jobs.
Wow, after doing Day 1 Level 1 of Jillian Michaels 30 Day Shred, I was sore today! Ouch! But I didn't let a little soreness get me down. Nope, I headed right on up to the office treadmill on my lunch break and walked 1.5 miles there. When I got home tonight I did complete Day 2 Level 1 of the 30 Day Shred too! This may sound strange, but it was easier today in spite of being super sore. Tomorrow's going to be the tough day though. I remember when I tried to do the 30 Day Shred before that Day 3 was really tough for me. I hope that it's easier tomorrow. The cardio is what kicks my butt. Jumping jacks....definitely not my easiest workout move! They're evil I tell you! Evil! But I know they serve a purpose, even if that purpose is to annoy me right now.
A kind lady gave me some old patchwork/quilting magazines today they are full of wonderful ideas that I cannot wait to try!
Species: Sockeye, pink and chum (called tea rose keta)
this mad gold,
"If I was in the audience I would definitely want to take a seed. But for the museum, it is a total work, and taking a seed would affect the work. Institutions have their own policies. But I know I would want to take a seed."Then, there are the health and safety laws which have to be considered. Indeed, within a few days of the exhibition opening, the Turbine Hall was closed, preventing visitors from walking over the sunflower seeds. Eventually, it was admitted that it was feared that the ceramic dust resulting from visitors walking over the sunflower seeds gave rise to certain health and safety concerns. In a statement, the gallery said:
So a TD with 10 years service would be entitled to an annual pension for the rest of their lives of €24, 606 while a TD with 20 years service gets the top pension - almost €50,000 a year.
December 2, 2011 9:54 AM
another hot one today, darlings, so i'll be drive-by blogging today.
Here is our tree and decorations with all the excitement of great things to come!
It is only conscientious, earnest, and committed players like Sachin Tendulkar are dedicated towards cricket give out all the 1996 cricket world cup dvd a balanced and powerful one to compete against its counterpart on field. Player tries to do his level best not to miss the 1996 cricket world cup final. Fans have started attaching their emotions with the 1996 cricket world cup dvd, then cricket podcast helps to remember the cricket world cup cruise and interesting cricket moments.
Throughout history the only successful way to beat a recession is through huge tax and spend programmes. The most famous example of this is Roosevelt’s New Deal. The principle is very simple: the more people in work, the better off the country is as a whole. Even if it is the government employing them, the economy is better off and the government actually recoups the money through taxation eventually. However, Osbourne wouldn’t be seen dead near a Keynesian policy and, despite the lack of evidence to back up his theories, many leading economists seem to favour Hayek’s conservative economics.
Then life got in the way and I didn't take up the pen again until 2000 when someone I met at work mentioned a writing group she'd joined. "I always wanted to be a writer," I said and she took me at my word. Everything spiralled from there. I shall always be grateful to the writer, Carol Purves, who dragged me along to my first meeting.
Tayshaun Prince – (Nike) Shox 2008 (Custom) – size 15
DARE I SAY MORE…..read ISAIAH 54 for the bigger picture.
The range of colours, as well as the strong horizontal patterns, had to be captured against that beautiful sky. For us, it was strange to be walking through Central Park in shorts and T-shirts, because frosty Melbourne was in the grip of winter when we flew out.
This is not only for the Husband and Wife relationship, but will work in all forms-work, children, parents, siblings, etc.
SCHEME OF RECONSTRUCTION.
#3 The Respect leaflet going out in Oldham states that Labour should “pause for self- relection” following the Woolas affair. This is correct.
Goodmorning to all!!!...... It's Saturday again.... URRA!!!
His storyline started with him dreaming about Godric. They were watching Sookie sleep and Godric said they should drain her together and walk in the sun. Eric said no and Godric told him he’s incapable of love and couldn’t be saved. He forced him to drink her, which caused Eric to wake from his dream and go watch Sookie sleep for real. When she woke up and saw him, he said in his super cute/innocent voice, “I had a bad dream.” He got into her bed, laid in her lap and cried. Sookie comforted him and reassured him that while he’s not Ghandi, he’s also not evil. He asked if he could stay with her until dawn and promised to keep his hands and fangs to himself. He rolled over and assumed the Little Spoon (!!!) position and told her, “I would never hurt anyone as beautiful as you.” Cue my heart melting.
Simultaneously excited and terrified for my scan on Thursday.
When thinking of this place, I suddenly remember how many years I’ve been here. I can’t believe I made so many memories yet I never sit down and think them over. I think about the food, the sight of school, the feeling of being in school, the beautiful park, and more. Whenever I’m asked to describe a place that’s important, my neighborhood is my number one choice and always will be, for it brings all my senses alive and makes me feel nostalgic.
The process of this reporting jumps out. Reporters navigating the legal and bureaucratic system produced this journalism, and it's an example of the highest exercise of our craft.
Add a lug of olive oil into your cast iron pan (one with a lid) and saute, add the chops and sprinkle over half the cumin, paprika and some salt & pepper, brown the chops and turn once, then add the carrots and put the chops on top of them, arrange the fennel over the chops (you may need to cut them into eighths, it just depends on how large they are to begin with). Sprinkle the remaining spices and chopped parsley over the fennel and add about a cup of water. You want to not quite cover the chops. By this time the tajine should almost be at the boil, cover with a tight fitting lid and turn the heat down so it’s just simmering and cook for about an hour, keep checking it though.
We eventually found the Church Bar, otherwise known as the old St Marys Church, “A Great Dublin Experience…
After all the drama’s of last year, the worries with my Dad and his dementia, the trauma of watching him suffer and his eventual passing, plus my own problems with shingles and diabetes I found that I seemed to come to a mental standstill. I have not even commented much on blogs that I have followed, although I have kept up with you all in the most part.
Whilst you're munching away on your delicious feast a naughty Dutch bird will saunter out and get rid of those unnecessary clothes and show you just how bendy those long legs of hers are. As the food drops from your mouth and back onto your plate the saucy sexpot will grind relentlessly at your table, gyrating what God so kindly gave her for your viewing pleasure. Seriously tasty stuff.
Fallen from his winter coat was left behind,
She’d undoubtedly recoil at the sight and then the crushing grip of his powerful forearms. They resembled thick clubs having been worked daily in preparation for the encounter he would soon embark upon.
Libby Kelting had always felt herself born out of time. No wonder the historical romance-reading, Jane Austen-adaptation-watching, all-around history nerd jumped at the chance to intern at Camden Harbor, Maine’s Oldest Living History Museum. But at Camden Harbor Libby’s just plain out of place, no matter how cute she looks in a corset. Her cat-loving coworker wants her dead, the too-smart-for-his-own-good local reporter keeps pushing her buttons, her gorgeous sailor may be more shipwreck than dreamboat — plus Camden Harbor’s haunted. Over the course of one unforgettable summer, Libby learns that boys, like ghosts, aren’t always what they seem.
My mad decorating skills didn't stop there! No, I found this desk for $5 at a yard sale. I've been looking for a writing desk for sometime and $5 fits snugly in my budget. It went from blah to well...I'll let you decide:
Come rolling up in a trail of dust
surprise. Industrial civilization is based on control, and control is
Hope you enjoyed my post. Over the weekend, I’ll give you a taste of the new parts of Sugar Daddy.
For the final test of sharing from Flickr, I’ve chosen one of my favorite sets. I love getting the bus and just hanging out in Thorncliffe Park. I quote from my description in Flickr:
And to all those I’ve been an Assmerican to, please accept my apologies – it’s never intentional…but it is likely to happen again.
Eh? Eh? All right, so my research wasn't exactly spot-on that time, and I ended up writing to the web developer and not the marketer. Still, the message is in the pipline now, and if any Shake Weights do come our way, we'll ship one out to Bill's Bayou ASAP.
Third, you can always go indie. But if you upload it, who will come? See First and Second points. It's your network and your volume that will get you noticed. Even with the cataclysmic changes in publishing right now, these two principles will hold true. In fact, this might be the best time in the history of the printed word to get on board.
I found this tutorial on-line that can explain TeuxDeux way better than I ever could.
If you are planning to run a news story on this matter and would like a comment from Jennifer, the most-recognized transsexual in the province of NL, please get in touch.
“England is at war. Henry VIII's invasion of France has gone badly wrong, and a massive French fleet is preparing to sail across the Channel. As the English fleet gathers at Portsmouth, the country raises the largest militia army it has ever seen. The King has debased the currency to pay for the war, and England is in the grip of soaring inflation and economic crisis.
sheer mention of it, of course, taking my referral to a palliative care team as a sure sign that my numbered days were of rather a smaller count than I’d like, but in fact I’ve discovered that it’s quite the opposite. Trinity are, simply, there to help not just those at the end of their lives, but those dealing with the kind of shit that’s landed in my lap; the kind of shit that, yes, has a conclusion nobody can escape but, more importantly, has a meantime that can be managed, be it with additional nursing and counselling, physio and complementary therapies, or occupational therapy and administrative assistance… all of which I’m entitled to, and all of which I’ve been feeling awkward about. Add to that the charities wanting to offer me grants, the organisations wanting to arrange special days out and the friends trying to organise once-in-a-lifetime treats, and I’ve got more guilt than a Catholic condom salesman.
1/4 tsp cayenne pepper
Somewhere in a parallel galaxy, battle lines are being drawn as intergalactic queens and cyber priestesses take swimwear to a futuristic dimension. It’s a brave new beach. Are you ready?
So – why am I doing 23 things? I think it’s always good for professional development to be a conscious thing to do, and I’m hoping to reflect more on my work as a librarian and where I want to go. Careerwise, I’ve been in children’s librarianship throughout my life – first in public libraries, and now in an international school in Thailand. I have a great job out here, and a great work/life balance, and I’m planning on staying out here at least 2 years. However, at the same time I’m shocked about everything I hear about the funding crisis in public libraries back home, and somewhat guilty that I’m not there fighting for the righteous cause myself. Eventually I do want to go back to working in public libraries, hopefully at a more senior level. On the other hand, working at a very well-funded school does have its benefits – it’s very easy to take unlimited glue-sticks for granted, let alone good levels of staffing, and budgetary freedom! I do also love working internationally, and would be very tempted by a job in a spanish-speaking country if one were ever to come up.
Onto our new challenge over at Mad for Markers is colouring grey, now this was a challenge for me as I have never done this before, so here is my attempt I have used this image and sentiment from The Greeting Farm Set 'A Journey', which I thought was just perfect. (This came in my blog candy stash from Debbie, thank you). You do not have to colour all your image grey if you don't want, just use some grey copics somewhere on your creation, your papers don't have to be grey either, I think my mood was grey at the time, so everything was grey lol!
And with that, the judge closes the hearing.
I can’t wait to watch the DVDs. I only wish I had written my thoughts earlier.
So thank you, Snow!
So much for the claim some religionists make, that they believe in a vague deity with a correspondingly high probability. Anyone who really believed in a vague deity, would have recognized their strange inhuman creator when Darwin said "Aha!"
